I bought a 2-pack of the orange flavor 5 hour energy drink at Wal-Mart.  I tried one bottle in the afternoon, the other 2 days later in the morning.  I drank the whole bottle, but saw no real change.  I don't drink coffee, so I can't imagine I have made myself insensitive to caffeine.<br /><br />The orange flavor tasted fine though.  Kind of like orange drink in elementary school.  It sounds like other reviewers don't like the berry or lemon-lime. No effect for me 1 2 
Beef might be listed as the first ingredient but that hardly makes it the main ingredient.  After reading the ingredients list this "food" seems to be mostly made up of various forms of soy.  I am not a fan of soy & with all the GMO crap being pushed on us, I like it even less.<br /><br />Upon presenting this artificially flavored & dyed product to my fur babies, they started to eat up.  But then one by one they stopped & looked at me as if to say, "What is this crap?  We don't want this.  Where's the stuff you normally give us?"  I left the food for them.  Several hours later, the food was still in the bowl & a disgusting explosion of black runny vomit was all over everything.  Jerk that I am, I continued to try to get them to eat it.  After all, I have a review to do - that's how I ended up with the food in the first place.  After several days I gave up.  One of my babies simply stopped eating.  That was the final straw.  I am not torturing my pets any longer.  They are back on their usual grub. No more black vomit.  Everyone is once again eating until the bowls are empty & my furbabies are back to their joyful behavior. Garbage 1 2 
Cadbury chocolate uses a different formula in each country it is manufactured.  New Zealand is uses more cream than Australia, etc.  This version by Hershey is not what you expect from England, Australia or New Zealand Cadbury.  It does not melt on your tongue like those countries so it tastes differently.<br /><br />If you are looking for the silky smooth easy melting chocolate find the non Hershey version.<br /><br />Hershey has missed an opportunity to introduce high quality Cadbury chocolate to USA. Not like other countries Cadbury 1 2 
Looks brown with a little bit of green and I do not want to drink it so what's there to do I already opened it and I doubt it's just my bag or if I could even get a return Brown Tea 1 3 
I'm a user of liquid stevia and i was looking for something i could use for baking.  The sweetener never dissolves with the wet ingredients, and, when your baking cools off, you have crunchy crystals of this sweetener in your baking. I even tried dissolving it first by warming up the wet ingredients, it appeared to dissolve, but after cooling i got the same results.  The other reviewers say that you tune into the taste in order to taste it.  I agree, if you use too little, it does not sweeten (you can't taste it), and if you use enough to taste it, you've ruined what you are trying to sweeten with it's nasty tin foil taste.  Dont bother using it for coffee or tea, because it sinks to the bottom of the cup because it does not completely dissolve even in hot water.  I should also mention that its not sweet in the slightest bit.  And i've been off sugar for years, so it's not because i'm used to real sugar.<br /><br />Bleh. Does not dissolve, not sweet, tastes like tin foil 1 2 
I like my espresso drinks. I wouldn't say I am an expert but I have at least one mocha (whole milk, half choc) daily from Kaldis, Starbucks or my new thing is making it on my office DeLonghi 32Bar Pump Espresso machine.<br />I wanted to like the Dolce Gusto Cappuccino, I really did. I wanted the no mess option for my home kitchen. It would save me money, it would save me time. So I read the reviews and I purchased it after serious consideration.<br />I am disappointed. All I could taste when I drank it, was a sort of powdered milk taste - it reminded me of coffee creamer which I never drink (the last time was stuck waiting for a car service at Midas three or four years ago). So if you really like your espresso and froth, this will not cut it. If you were having a party and your guests were not foodies, or wanted coffee in the morning in a rush, or if you don't mind the taste of coffee creamer, then this is not the worst espresso drink I have ever had. It compares to an average restuarant that serves this type of drink BUT does [not] compare to a coffee house despite the claims on the box.<br />See my review on the Cafe Lungo option if you want to know what it tastes like when you remove the milk capsule as a factor... Disappointed, tastes like coffee creamer 1 2 
I do not recommend this food for your pet. I ordered this as a replacement food for my two adult boxers. About a week after transitioning to this food my two year old female started having head tremors. I did some research and found that this is benign and can happen with foods with certain ingredients. I changed the food and the head tremors stopped. I now feed my dogs Taste of the Wild and love it. Caused head tremors in my Boxer. 1 2 
My lab chewed up the rope in a couple hours. This alone is not a huge deal as the instructions with the toy say that a ball can be placed inside the container and have a similar effect as the rope. However, before I could even place a ball in it, the plastic developed a large crack from the dog just carrying his toy around the house and dropping it on our carpetted floors. He has other plasic toys that he has had for months with absolutely no signs of damage. Good for a couple days 1 2 
These were a sore disappointment to the Nana's brand. I love the Chocolate Chip and Peanut Butter but these were way to dry and powdery. The flavor was good but the texture made my stomach turn. Does Not Compare To Other Nana's Cookies 1 2 
This is for the Health Valley Tomato Soup No Salt Added, 15 Ounce Cans (Pack of 12).  I purchased this specifically for a person with heart problems.  One of the problems with canned foods is too much sodium, so the No Salt Added is a good feature.  Another problem is cholesterol content.  The ad for this product states 0 mg cholesterol, which is a false statement.  Apparently the supplier did not update the ad when Health Valley changed their recipe for their No Salt Tomato soup and is now adding cholesterol.  The cans I received have a "NEW" on the label, which the can shown in the ad does not.  This is an honest mistake on the seller's part, but he should correct it, and he should list the true contents. no salt soup ad says no cholesterol; the facts are different. 1 2 
I thought this was a great deal in the warehouse deals section, but it was pretty nasty and smelled like dog food when I opened each bag.  Slim Jim is made of crap too but at least it tastes good. Tastes a lot like dog food 1 2 
Before I ordered this coffee, I read reviews both here at Amazon and on other sites.  I used reviewers comments to base my decision to purchase it.  I am a lover of Starbucks Espresso Decaf coffee.  I have my own Breville espresso machine at home.  I have been using Starbucks for years.  My Lavazzo coffee arrived and I was eager to give it a try.  I opened the tin to find brown coffee - while I already knew I would be disappointed because I already know I prefer Black coffee beans to brown. While it pulled a decent looking cup, I put it to my mouth only to find it did not match my tastebuds. One sip was all it took for me to hand it off to my husband.  So. My verdict here is, if you are like me and enjoy only black bean coffee DO NOT buy this product.  If you prefer brown bean coffee, give it a go. Nothing like Starbucks coffee 1 4 
I had high hopes for this - I added it to seltzer water and it tastes every so slightly like root beer...more like diet root beer.  I was hoping to use this as a soda replacement to try to be a bit healthier - but I doubt we'll even finish this bottle. Ick 1 2 
Wasnt happy with this purchase. Coffee was completly stale I guess thats why they price was good, But wont purchase again. Stale 1 2 
I truly love the Rieme Pomegranate Sparkling Lemonade.  DO NOT, repeat: DO NOT order this product online and have it shipped.  I ordered 4 bottles, and 2 of the bottles leaked have of it contents into the shipping box.  It took me 20-30 minute to clean the mess up and salvage the 2 other bottles.  (It would have cost more and been a huge mess to return for credit)  The "unique metal fastener seal" on this bottle is not designed to be shipped FedEx or UPS. BUY THIS PRODUCT FROM YOUR LOCAL RETAILER. Excellent product, NOT made for shipping.  Buy it in a store. 1 2 
I've ordered the sugar free Hazelnut syrup from Amazon before and it tasted just as I expected (like my local coffee house).  However, my most recent order (a pack of 3 bottles) tasted like caramel, smells very sweet and has no hint of hazelnut. I thought perhaps is was a packaging mistake since all 3 bottles had the same horrible taste. However, I was told that Torani changed the recipe. If you're expecting a hazelnut flavor, don't order this product anymore unfortunately. Recipe changed!! 1 2 
At this price, I was expecting 3 bottles; got a nasty surprise when 1 bottle got delivered.  Amazon sells other brands of 3 bottles for the same price that taste just as good. This is for just 1 bottle! 1 2 
I bought this product thinking that it would be good for a rainy (or snowy) day. But actually I would rather have cereal than this. It is salty and has no taste at all. Perhaps since I am of Indian origin, I expected something more suited to my palate as I see that most of the others have given this a good rating (and that is what made me buy it in the first place). I have purchased similar stuff from grocery stores and they taste much better so it has to be this product. Definitely, will not buy in the future and not recommend either. Bon Appetit, folks! Salty, and tasteless 1 2 
I have tried 4 times to make cocoa with this product.  Twice it appeared to plug the coffee maker and would only provide about one once of cocoa.  The other two times the product worked correctly.  I do not think it is the coffee maker problem because it has made dozens of cups of coffee with no problems.  So I can not recommend this product. Problem with making the cocoa 1 2 
I bought these as a quick snack and because they were on sale. My kids won't eat them because 'they're yucky.' I tried them and indeed they are!<br /><br />They're dry and tasteless. Pretty Dry and Tasteless 1 2 
I received a pack of 8 cans of formula. Which 6 were damaged. I paid $80.00 for all but two cans to be partly opened. I  returned items. However, I still have not received new formula. The product is wonderful.I just wish that the delivery and shipping process was handled with care. Damaged cans. 1 3 
I did not like them, they seemed flavorless compared to other brands.  The Byzantine olives are a little more, but are a MUCH better product.  I will likely never buy a Roland olive product again, as I was disappointed with their black olives as well. Did not like them!  Yuck! 1 2 
Unfortunately these nuts have left me with "pine mouth" it's been about 4 days since eating them and it doesn't seem to be going away anytime soon. Do some research before you buy! I have contacted the FDA on the matter so we will see where that goes... Chinese nuts! Avoid or you will end up with "pine mouth" like me! 1 2 
I'm sorry I just can't eat this.  It is too thick and chewy and slimy to eat.  I have tried, several times, several different ways. I wanted to like it. It isn't something I will buy again.  I do, however, like the angel hair pasta.  Is is much thinner and is easier to chew and good in soups and oriental dishes. Yuck 1 2 
purchased and it came looking new, as i had bought it NEW, but it was actually damaged.<br />customer service with the actual company is awful--as i needed to contact the company itself to return it. came damaged. 1 2 
I ordered these to try them out and the price was cheaper than the supermarket.  The cinnamon apple bars are not tasty at all.  They have a very dry texture and taste chalky with a (surprisingly) bitter after taste.<br /><br />Basically, they are not palatable...there are better fiber bars out there--especially the <a href="http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/B000YNQRSM">Gnu Foods Flavor & Fiber Cinnamon Raisin 1.6 oz. (Pack of 16)</a> --<br /><br />I know a few people gave high ratings to this, but honestly, these bars are not very good at all.....YUCK is the best way to describe them. Yuck...they are really not tasty at all! 1 2 
After reading all of the positive reviews, I was anxious to try out this product.  I was so disappointed when I got it.  The texture is chalky and the taste to me is unpleasant.  It was really quite solid so I warmed it up so that I could mix it up better.  It became more of a spreadable consistency, but the grainy texture and the taste did not improve.  I'm going to try using some of it in my smoothies, but if it still doesn't taste good to me, it's going into the garbage.<br /><br />I also ordered the Artisana coconut butter and Artisana macadamia butter.  I had the same same bad experience with the coconut butter in that the texture was grainy and the taste was unpleasant to me.  I did, however, really like the macadamia butter a lot. dislike!  awful tasting 1 2 
I will start by being kind, It is a good idea to save money with an item or concept like this. It makes good sense to use your own coffee beans and avoid the cost of the pre-filled commercial K-cups you buy at the store.<br /><br />Now, I received my DisposaKups over a month after ordering them and put them to use.  I was immediately disappointed, filters did not hold very much coffee, It was a struggle to get the lids to fit together with the filter and outer plastic cup.  The coffee was very weak.<br /><br />This product actually creates more waste in a landfill than the commercially made K-cups. The body and lids are plastic.  Normal K-cups do not have a plastic lid.  Notice they say 100% disposable....So put them in the trash. They are not recyclable = landfill.<br /><br />They are not convenient, they are a bit messy, a pain to put together and still expensive.  Not worth it! There are better alternatives out there that will save you money, make better coffee and not go into a landfill.<br /><br />Sorry, I wish I had better news, I think I will return these. Liking things that make sense and work 1 2 
The package had 2" cuts down the center of the bag. The bag was also wrinkly. When I purchase this dog food at local stores the bags never look in bad condition as this one did. Some kibble had come through the cuts and spilled in the amazon packaging box. Not pleased, who knows how sanitary the food is anymore with the bag  broken. Love wellness brand dog food, but not the seller.<br />About wellness small breed- my toy poodle I was told was underweight even with free feed on  eukanuba  but know is a health weight due to the good taste and small kibble size. After disc surgery I soaked his food and he ate on own, big accomplishment for a picky eater who is in post surgery discomfort. Low low marks for seller, love Wellness brand 1 2 
I'm a big fan of Jack Link's beef jerky, especially their flavored jerky's. I hadn't seen this one in the stores so when it went on sale on Amazon I scooped it up. Generally the beef nuggets and tendercuts style jerky's are not my favorite, for some reason the beef gets very rubbery compared to the regular style cuts, but I knew this diving into the bag of jerky.<br /><br />At first the taste was like the beef had been dropped in a pile of debris on a smokehouse floor, smokey, meaty and ashy tasting. I thought maybe it was just the initial taste  and continued to chew. It only worsened as I continued and eventually I swallowed and was met with a disgusting taste left in my mouth.<br /><br />Now that I have all four bags remaining I'm not sure what to do with them. I may give them away as a gag gift for the holidays and literally watch people gag as they try to eat this. Like Beef Dipped in an Ashtray 1 2 
If one reads this products ingredients they will find that the first ingredient is cows milk, then SUGAR (diabetic maker), then milk, again. The fourth ingredient is sunflower oil, fifth ingredient is maltodextrin which is starch produced from grain containing the sugars maltose and dextrin, with the seventh ingredient being, get this, tuna fish oil. They even feature vitamin D3, which is animal derived. There are four different sugar sources in it and some artificial flavor for good measure. If we really think about what we are feeding our babies, would we use this product? I know I wouldn't. Know your food sources. Read and read well. 1 2 
Have a 6-month old black labrador.  She destroyed toy in less than a week.  When the container broke, it was very sharp. Didn't last long 1 2 
I had such a hard time with this fondant.  I have used Wilton for years and have done many good things with it so I decided to "step it up".  Boy am I sorry I did.  I had a 4 tiered anniversary cake to do in ivory.  I HATE coloring fondant so I figured this was as good a time as any to try a new fondant that was already colored so I ordered Satin Ice (...or SATAN Ice as I now call it).  I took it out of the tub and set it on the counter.  My 9 year old twins both said WHAT is that?!  I said "It's fondant!"  Having seen me work with fondant for many years, they both said "It looks too GOOEY to be fondant!!".  Boy... even at 9 they are VERY observant.  It was very easy to roll out, but getting it ON the cake was a different story.  When I picked it up to put it on the cake it fell apart in my hands.  I attempted this 4 times.  Finally I put wax paper underneath it, rolled it out and flipped it onto the cake.  Easy enough.....or so I thought until I saw all the wrinkles transferred from the wax paper...back to the drawing board.  I ended up putting wax paper underneath, rolling it out, putting wax paper on top, flipping it over, THEN putting it on the cake....only to find that it still tore in the process.  UGH.  I'm exhausted!!  Never again. Difficult to work with 1 4 
My rating of 1 Star does not reflect my opinion of Peppadew peppers, it is intended to cause Amazom (and Divina) to edit their ads for the 70 oz. package to identify this 70 oz. package of Peppadews as either mild or hot. This is important, if not critical information to the customer when deciding whether or not to purchase this item. Mild or Hot? 1 2 
Ads a very pleasant taste to my stir fry experience. As tasty in my home cooking , comparable to that in a chinese restaurant. A product that I will always keep on hand for my cooking pleasure. kadoya pure sesame oil 1 3 
These K-cups are good when they don't explode - but a lot of them have exploded during brewing and made a mess all over my kitchen. Exploding K-Cups 1 2 
Although the cereal is a great tasting cereal I gave this one star because the price of $41.50 that they are selling it for here on Amazon is rediculous!!! That's almost $7 a box. I don't know about you but I know I've never paid $7 for a box of cereal. Wal-Mart sells the 21 oz. (6 pack) of Life Cinnamon cereal for $19.68. Just make sure you shop around because when you see a deal that you think may be to good to be true, it probably is NOT a good deal. Don't be fooled by the price!!!!! 1 2 
I was really hopeful when I ordered these Fruit Slices.  It had been a long time since I had eaten any Fruit Slices, and was hoping to spark a delicious memory from my childhoood!  BUT, I was so disappointed when I ate my first slice - yes, I ate the entire piece, HOPING that the flavor would get better, but alas, the flavor did not improve.  The slice I tasted was supposedly watermelon, but all I could taste was a bitter, sour fruit.  I took one bite tastes of the other flavors, and couldn't tell much difference in any of the flavors, other than a bitter, sour fruit taste.  So - save your money, and look for a different brand of fruit slices to buy! Worst Fruit Slices I have ever tasted! 1 2 
This gardenia tree looked so cute online and we love gardenias. It arrived with a note to hurry and purchase a tray to go under the pretty pot which has 2 draining holes. It was a surprise this was not included. The plant did however come complete with ectoparasites (something like green scales clinging to the branches) and white flies. It was also not as mature as shown in photo - more like 3 branches with scant green and yellow leaves. came complete or did it? 1 2 
Either I got 15 tubes that came from a bad batch lot or they are not selling the right Harissa. I bought 15 tubes thru Amazon from Parthenon Foods and used 4 of them so far and after putting the whole tube it still isn't spicy at all. Normally a whole tube would get you to sweat a bit!!!!! This seems to be a case of false representation. I buy these tubes in Canada at the grocery store all the time when I am up there and they provide a nice kick and spice (as they should). What's up with dat? Not spicy at ALL! 1 2 
Might be me, but I am sorry I bought so many packages/how I'm going to eat this is still a mystery. Perhaps cutting the product up in 1 inch pieces. Unless You have razor teeth, this is impossible to chew. Made a batch that has been sitting in tomatoes, and still like rubber bands. I was raised on 'scratch' cooking,might be a personal issue.<br /><br />Reporting back: I used a new pair of scissors and cut noodles up in 1/2 inch pieces. The solution is to swallow the bits w/o chewing. I couldn't throw product on compost heap as I believe the MIRACLE noodle would not break down.<br /><br /> The Miracle in the product name is-if you can get them down without the noodles wrapping around your tonsils,it's a miracle. My father said a hungry man will eat anything,if he is hungry enough/ first time my father was wrong. I also have a sneaking feeling that there might be paid reviewers for this company. Also, I haven't watched a Doctor Oz show since. 11 more pkgs to go/good thing product has long shelf life 1 2 
When I gave this to my dog he instantly went to town. As I sat and watched him I noticed the white t-rex had cut my dog's mouth from the sharp edges. He is an aggressive chewer and didn't want to see it go, but it really required too much supervision than I felt comfortable with. Cute Dinosaur Not Cute Dog Teeth 1 2 
I bought this thinking it would be a lot like regular whipped cream. Just tried it and the taste is nothing like it. Not what I expected it tastes really bad Taste is not what you think 1 2 
I have tried many "energy drinks" and try to use them sparingly, but with everyone's overloaded schedules these days, it's easy to see why people buckle under for some "magic" pick me up sometimes. This particular drink is one of, if not the worst I've ever tried! It's so sweet that you will wince while swallowing this stuff. It also has a terrible taste(whatever flavor it is?)that will not leave you wanting more, but will leave a "I can't wait until it's over" sensation. If you want a good one that doesn't effect your stomach(like me, if I drink three cups of coffe, my stomach is wrenched!) try Celcius, it's very low carb and doesn't make you run out of gas. Like all of these drinks, it's easy to become addicted to them, use only when you just need a boost and not just because you like to ZING! ha-ha! ....Oh yeah and you all know the "magic" is caffeine... right? ;-b WAY TOO SWEET AND TASTE TERRIBLE! 1 2 
After drinking some most excellent coffee in Hungary, I discovered it was Douwe Egberts coffee, so I ordered some from Amazon.  After paying almost as much in postage as the package of coffee cost, I was extremely disappointed in the coffee itself.  The package I received was stale and flavorless.  I can buy Tully's French Roast at the supermarket for about $7 per 12 ounces, and it is far better coffee, fresh, with a rich aroma, full bodied flavor and no harshness or bitterness. Not worth the cost 1 2 
Chef Michael's Sirloin Steak dog food is candy for dogs. They, mine included, seem to snarf it up like kids love junk food.  The problem is that it IS junk food. It's filled with ingredients that should be avoided but are likely to be highly palatable to dogs and may also be appealing to their owners. Doesn't Grilled Sirloin Steak sound yummy?<br /><br />Let's start with the easy part, price. I feed my dog dry Eukanuba. To compare,  Chef Michel's costs 14 cents an ounce vs. 9.4 cents an ounce for Eukanuba. It is even more expensive considering that it contains 2% more moisture than Eukanuba.<br /><br />Now, what's the problem with the ingredients in Chef Michael's?  Here's the list of what's in it:<br /><br />Beef,  soybean meal,  soy flour,  animal fat preserved with mixed-tocopherols (form of Vitamin E), brewers rice,  soy protein concentrate,  corn gluten meal,  ground yellow corn, glycerin,  poultry by-product meal, ground wheat, animal digest, pearled barley, calcium carbonate, calcium phosphate, salt, grilled sirloin steak flavor, dried green beans, dried potatoes, sulfur, Vitamin E supplement, choline chloride, zinc sulfate, ferrous sulfate, added color (Red 40, Blue 2, Yellow 5, Yellow 6), niacin, wheat flour, potassium chloride, L-Lysine monohydrochloride, manganese sulfate, Vitamin A supplement, calcium pantothenate, thiamine mononitrate, copper sulfate, riboflavin supplement, Vitamin B-12 supplement, pyridoxine hydrochloride, garlic oil, Vitamin D-3 supplement, folic acid, calcium iodate, menadione sodium bisulfite complex (source of Vitamin K activity), biotin, sodium selenite.<br />Here are the questionable ingredients, in order of volume in contents:<br /><br />Soybean Meal and Soy Flour: the second and third largest ingredients in Chef Michael's. After removing most of the oil from soybeans by a solvent or mechanical extraction process, grinding the remaining flakes gives you "soybean meal." "Soy flour" is another byproduct of soybean processing. These are cheap sources of protein filler used to boost the protein content of dog foods. This type of protein does not provide the dog with as much usable protein as does fish, chicken, lamb, beef or other meats. All proteins are not equal in value to the dog.<br /><br />Animal Fat: the fourth largest ingredient, according to the Association of American Feed Control Officials (AAFCO), animal fat in dog food is obtained from the tissues of mammals and/or poultry in the commercial processes of rendering or extracting. This means ANY animals, including the "4-D animals" (dead, diseased, disabled, or dying prior to slaughter), goats, pigs, horses, rats, roadkill, animals euthanized at shelters and restaurant and supermarket refuse. This is NOT a quality ingredient.<br /><br />Brewers Rice: the fifth ingredient, is the small milled fragments of rice kernels left after milling whole rice.  Although it has calories, it has little nutritional value.<br /><br />Soy Protein Concentrate: what remains of soybeans after removing the water soluble carbohydrates from the beans.  Similar to soybean meal and flour, this is an inexpensive way to boost protein, but contains a very low quality of protein.<br /><br />Corn Gluten Meal: yet, another plant-based protein booster. Gluten is the residue remaining after corn has had most of its starchy carbohydrate washed out of it.  It has little nutritional value, and is used mainly as a filler and binder.<br /><br />Corn: an inexpensive filler with little nutritional value for the dog.<br /><br />Poultry Byproduct Meal: a dry rendered product of slaughterhouse waste made from what's left of slaughtered poultry after all the prime cuts have been removed.  This includes almost anything left after the actual meat has been removed: organs (the nourishing part), feet, beaks, undeveloped eggs -- anything except quality skeletal muscle (real meat). Although, by-product meals are meat concentrates and contain nearly 300% more protein than fresh poultry, they are less digestible than chicken meat. Also, there is absolutely no control over the quality and consistency of poultry and other meat byproducts.<br /><br />Wheat: See the comments for corn, above.<br /><br />Animal Digest: a broth made of animal by-products that is usually sprayed onto the dry kibble to improve its taste.  Although it cannot contain hair, horns, teeth, hooves and feathers, except in such trace amounts as might occur unavoidably in good factory practice, it is made of unspecified parts of unspecified animals. As with animal fat, there is no control over quality or contamination and may include "4-D animals" (dead, diseased, disabled, or dying prior to slaughter), goats, pigs, horses, rats, roadkill, animals euthanized at shelters and restaurant and supermarket refuse.<br /><br />Artificial Colorings: solely to appeal to the dog owner. These ingredients are of no nutritional value and are controversial.<br /><br />Menadione: a controversial form of vitamin K linked to liver toxicity, allergies and the abnormal break-down of red blood cells.  It is unnecessary in dog food. Candy for Dogs 1 2 
I purchase a lot of baby food in bulk through Amazon.  This is the first food that I've found that not only would my little one not eat, he literally gagged on it.  I tried it myself and found that it tastes terrible.  There's something in it I can't quite put my finger on, but it is wretched.  In an attempt to see if it was just us, I gave the remaining case to a friend of mine whose daughter is 3 weeks younger than my son.  He also said she gagged on it and wouldn't eat it.  It 20 pouches ended up in the trash.  I wouldn't recommend this unless you've purchased just one and know that your little one will eat it. Horrible taste and smell 1 2 
Great, I bought the 6 pack of these things, not realizing how awful they taste!!  The reviews gave me the impression they'd be good, but trust me, these are nasty!!  They are not sweet enough, and have a weird after taste.  Sort of like a peanut shell aftertaste or something.  Not very pleasant.  Not a lot of chewy-ness to these either, just big pieces of rice and very little chewy texture.  The berry variety of these seem to have great reviews, stick with those ones if you HAVE to try the Crispy Rice Bars!!!! YUCK! Do NOT buy this flavor!!! 1 2 
My son wouldn't eat it either! I tasted it... I would not eat it, also. Tasteless, unappetizing in texture and  flavor.<br />It says "minimal processing"... does that mean it is not even cooked? No wonder our babies and toddlers hate it!!! I would NEVER knowingly feed my child or myself RAW meat. Cooked? 2 1 
I was thinking this was a nice low calorie snack, but I'm sorry - 38% of your sodium in one little packet is obscene!  Not to mention that it TASTES too salty.  It overpowers any other flavor that this soup might have...  Very disappointing...  They should offer a low sodium option that might be more palatable... SOOOOOOO SALTY!!! 2 1 
The seasoning was very difficult to shake out of container as it appeared to be stuck together. I suspect this product was outdated, although wasn't able to find a an expiration date on the container. Not very happy with this purchase. Very disappointed 2 1 
I bought this based on my experience in europe. I figured it was Italian and would taste as much of the coffees did when last I visited Europe, Bold and stout. Also, I was drawn in by the words "La Crema"...meant strong and with much head like a beer I thought.Unfortunately, the coffee was much like a regular, everyday folgers blend, kinda bland and fairly regular. Buy it if you like regular coffee but pass otherwise. Fair to midland 2 3 
This coffee's main advantage is its size!<br /><br />The coffee itself is nothing special and it certainly does not deserved to be labelled as a "medium" roast coffee.  In fact I wonder, how weak must Gevalia's mild brews must be.<br /><br />I was excited about the variety of coffees when I purchased my Tassimo but so far I have been disappointed by all except the Starbuck's blends (which are pricier).  I made a special trip to the US to purchase a few packages of these since many comments pointed towards a comparable alternative to the Starbucks.<br /><br />Having gone through a few now, I'd argue that it's the same as the Nabob Morning Roast sold in Canada.<br /><br />Now back to the size argument, if you had an extra 3oz to the Starbuck's house blend, you will have much richer tasting 12 oz cup of medium roast coffee. Not Outstanding 2 3 
I bought the vanilla, orange, mango, lemon and peach flavors of these.  They are OKAY in hot foods - I used them in herbal teas and to punch up my orange chicken.  However, these were only good in hot foods and in very small quantities.  They were extremely bitter and were completely useless in cold foods because even a couple drops made the item so bitter the food was inedible.  Even in hot foods the bitterness came out after a couple drops.  Save your money and use a better brand like truvia and just flavor your food with pure extracts from the baking aisle.  No bitterness and you get to control the level of flavor. Okay for hot foods 2 1 
After using French Vanilla creamer in other coffees, I made the jump to French Vanilla coffee.  What a mistake.  Definitely not the same.  Not even close.  This coffee is weak and the french vanilla flavor is barely noticeable to me.  Ended up pitching the rest and going with that amazing Italian Blend, also by Timothy's. Weak 2 1 
The low acidity of this coffee is probably a good thing for folks that have trouble with that sort of thing. I found the taste to be lacking and a bit bitter. I brewed it weak and strong and prefered it on the weak side.  It's not a bad tasting coffee just not my cup of...coffee. OK Coffee 2 3 
They were $2.50 at the grocery store when I flew back home over Christmas. I bought four and brought them back with me, still paying less than these distributors.<br /><br />Buy the powder, but not on amazon. Great Product. Wtf price. 2 4 
Ok, yes, this particular whey protein doesn't contain artificial sweeteners or other stuff you don't want in your diet but it really tastes awful and I haven't found a satisfactory way to dress it up.  I tried putting it in my coffee...it just ruined my normally delicious cup of coffee.  I tried putting it in juice but I had to make the juice (from frozen) really concentrated to make it taste ok..and then it still smells awful.  Jarrows whey may be better than 30 others out there but it's still not good enough to make me happy to take it.  I always like it when other reviewers tell me what's a better option so here's my advice.  Buy a jug of Optimum Nutrition Solid Gold.  It has fake sweeteners which I don't like but it tastes really good in a glass of skim milk! I'll probably throw the rest of this Jarrows whey in the garbage (unless I figure out how to cook with it or something). Yeach 2 1 
One of six pieces of rind would pop.  The one that puffed up was great but not worth time or money. Inconsistent 2 3 
My dog loved the taste. They are perfect for a treat, but once a pill of ANY size was inserted, he would find it, spit it out and eat the treat. Maybe for some dogs, but did not work for mine. Not for my dog 2 3 
I guess you could sum it up by saying, "you get what you pay for."  While it was a good price for the product and it was shipped and received in a timely manner, the product itself tasted less than fresh.  So far, the  cookie/candy bars that we've had have had an after-taste of an unfresh product. Twix-Chocolate Carmel Cookie Bars, 36ct 2 3 
The crystalized ginger drink tastes much the same as other such drinks readily available at many Asian markets at half the price. I see other reviewers complained about after taste and it being too strong. I haven't run across a ginger drink that is too strong, so maybe it is just me but this one is relatively mild. At first, I didn't taste anything bad in the after taste but I wrote the review before finishing the drink... then went back to revise. Yes, not as good as I thought after the flavor lingers. It is a mediocre product at an premium price. High Priced 2 3 
I cannot detect any vanilla flavor at all in this tea, instead it tastes like cloves. Doesn't Taste Live Vanilla 2 1 
I think this is one of those types of food products where you will either really like it or not care for it.<br /><br />I am a chocolate fan and I love chocolate and almonds, so I figured this was a natural fit for me.<br /><br />Upon opening the first bar it seems like any other bar of it's type. However, once that first bite was in my mouth it's evident it was not. The chocolate in these bards over powers the taste of anything else. Like I said, I'm a chocolate fan but this was just too potent of chocolate for my tastes.<br /><br />Since there were a dozen in the box I decided to let a few others try them. It was a mixed bag of results there too. One person took one bite and would have no more. One said they were okay with coffee. One person ate an entire bar before deeming it "not very good". The last person really liked them and said he would buy them in a store. So, basically 1 out of 5 people in my highly unscientific research liked them.<br /><br />I guess if you are a dark chocolate person these may be something you'll like. But if you're not stay clear of these. Didn't care of it too much 2 3 
Sorry but I do not like bitter food but know I now. I love olives but not these dried ones. Dried olives 2 1 
I couldn't get past the acidic taste of this coffee. I know French roasts are strong, but this one was overpowering. Doesn't taste like it's low-acid 2 1 
Crackers looked fine but I didn't try them because the ingredient list on the package listed soy, which I can't have.  I went back and checked the Amazon description and the ingredient list did NOT list soy.  Makes me hesitate to order grocery items if I can not trust the information on the description. Crackers contain SOY. 2 1 
We tried this a couple times, but we have a SUBSTANTIAL preference for the Kraft Bacon Ranch Pasta Salad.  It's the same idea as this, but for some reason the Betty Crocker Suddenly Salad gave our family upset stomachs both times we tried it.  In fact, my kids started calling it "Suddenly something down your leg", which is what it is known as to this day in our house.  The sad part is the Kraft version is MUCH harder to find, but definitely superior.  Check out the Kraft one - more delicious and less crampy results. Beware of the "Suddenly" part 2 3 
I was disappointed because I didn't pay attention to the quantity of the coffee.  I feel it's way overpriced for the very little coffee you get.  Two ounces of coffee for $8 is not a fair price. Disappointed 2 1 
I normally like glutino but their honey nut flavor is so boring and the texture is wierd. Apple cinnamon flavor is significantly better so if you are buying one of the two definately go with the apple cinnamon. However, the best gluten free cheerio is PerkyO's Frosted Cheerio. Amazon......WHY is it not for sale on your site??? PerkyO's is excellent in size of the "O" as well as taste. In my opinion the frosted PerkyO is better, more flavorful than the original brand but amazon needs to sell both. Especially for the young toddler that needs just the right size for their little fingers, the original is a good choice for them as well as for those of you who don't like sugar much. NO FLAVOR!!  Don't waste your money. 2 4 
Go to any grocery store, gas station or nutrition shop, and you will no doubt be overwhelmed with the panoply of energy drinks on the shelves. There is clearly money to be made here, so every company under the sun has their own brand, replete with flashy packaging and a mad-scientist assortment of ingredients. No Fear Super Energy Supplement drink is just such a drink. The cool black can with the menacing skull and bold lettering are alluring, likely to attract many. Tread cautiously, dear energy drink consumers.<br /><br />The aforementioned flashy labeling atop the can highlights ingredients such as Taurine, Arginine and L-Carnitine, which are all great components of a good energy drink, but the quantity included in this beverage are so minimal that their impact is likely negligible. And caffeine? 85mg per serving. Slightly higher than a cup of green tea. Basically, every ingredient falls far short of being able to have any real impact -- other than the sugar. But, I'll let the nutritional panel speak for itself:<br /><br />Serving Size: 8 fl oz (240ml)<br />Servings Per Container: 2<br /><br />Amount Per Serving:<br />Calories: 130<br />Total Carb.: 34g (11%)<br />Sugars: 33g<br />Vitamin C: 60mg (100%)<br />Vitamin B6: 2mg (100%)<br />Folic Acid: 40mcg (10%)<br />Vitamin B12: 6mcg (100%)<br />Zinc: 1.5mcg (10%)<br />Selenium: 7mcg (10%)<br />Sodium: 100mg (4%)<br />Potassium: 20mg (1%)<br /><br />Proprietary Blend: 1.35g<br />Taurine: 1000mg<br />Innositol: 100mg<br />Caffeine: 87mg<br />Panex ginseng Root Extract: 50mg<br />Guarana (Paullinia Cupana) Seed Extract: 25mg<br />Grape Seed Extract: 25mg<br />L-Carnitine: 25mg<br />L-Arginine: 10mg<br /><br />Ingredients: Carbonated Water, High Fructose Corn Syrup, Citric Acid, Taurine, Grape Juice Concentrate (Color), Sodium Citrate, Natural Flavor (Contains Soy), Inositol, Ascorbic Acid, Caffeine, Caramel Color, Fruit Juice Concentrate (Color), Monopotassium Phosphate, Grape Seed Extract, L-Carnitine, L-Arginine Hydrochloride, Zinc Methionine Sulfate, Panax Ginseng Root Extract, Guarana (Paullina Cupana) Seed Extractive, Pyridoxine Hydrochloride, Potassium Sorbate, Selenium Complex with Amino Acids and Polypeptides, Folic Acid, Cyanocobalamin.<br /><br />Well, if that list isn't compelling enough to get you to rush out and slam a few of these, maybe the taste will! The flavor is something akin to a slightly un-ripened fruit blend, with a metallic, vitamin aftertaste. If you aren't yet drooling, then perhaps the energy rush will get your head swirling. Speaking of ... .<br /><br />For an "energy supplement," there was nary a buzz derived from this beverage. I experienced an ever-so-slight perk, likely due to the sugar content, rather than the blend of B-Vitamins, amino acids and caffeine, which was quickly followed by a large crash, again, likely due to the sugar (66g in the entire can, may I remind you!).<br /><br />Bottom line:  No Fear Super Energy drink is essentially nothing more than colored sugar (well, high fructose corn syrup, specifically) water. You're honestly better off drinking a good old 12 ounce can of Mountain Dew, which has better flavor, a bigger energy boost, lower caloric impact and cheaper cost. Fear the No Fear. Big on sugar, low on ... everything else 2 4 
1 Month ago I looked up this product and it was about $23 for a case. I thought good price I will order next month.  I came back to order and the price nearly doubles!!!  What is with that?  Is there a shortage of coconuts?  Does any one know? What's up with the price? 2 1 
And where's the vegetable's while your at it? The last 3 or 4 cans of this that I've had has only had 5 or 6 little bits of beef in them. This last one was mostly carrots. It should have been called "Carrots in Beef Broth" Soup. It only had 6 pieces of meat and 5 or 6 little chunks of potato with about 20 pieces of carrots. I usually dump a handful of frozen sweet corn or peas in it and a handful of instant rice to help fill it out. But this time I was out of frozen veggies so I got to see just what ISN'T in the soup. Like there's more stuff missing than in it. Once I finish off the cans that I have left I sure ain't going to waist any more of my money on it.<br /><br />I scanned and uploaded the ingredients on the label from one of the smaller microwavable cans of the same Chunky Beef Soup. What I have got OUT of the can sure ain't like the picture ON the can! where's the Beef? It's "NOT" like the picture on the can! 2 3 
As of this review, I've also tried Taste of Thai, Thai Kitchen and Thai Pavilion versions. For a Dr. McDougal product, the amount of sodium is inexcusable. Taste of Thai was the lowest in sodium (and best tasting of all, by far) clocking in at just 320 mg. Next in the sodium ladder is Thai Kitchen at 650 mg., then Thai Pavilion at 810 mg. The Dr. McDougal version, which the label says has 480 mg. is for a very small serving size, less than half a serving compared to all the others. So, multiply the McDougal version by 2 to get the real comparative sodium and you're at 960 mg. Like I said, inexcusable and from supposedly a "healthy" product. All I can say is watch your blood pressure folks. Way too much sodium for a Dr. McDougal product 2 3 
These are so healthy, and I feel great giving them to my children.  I was disappointed with the packaging, though.  I am opening my second box and found that some of the packages of puree weren't sealed properly in the corners and they leaked on the others.  What a mess!  I bought another variety in the same brand and it was fine.  I would probably buy these again, but I don't know. Healthy product, bad package sealing 2 3 
The tree came on time; but two words describe the tree I receive:  Ugly and sickly.  Obviously, I am not as lucky as the others in the reviews had said their trees were so wonderful.  Mine is consisted of only one twig, no branching, nothing like the picture!  I contacted the seller; he told me that in the description it says, "Tree shape and size may vary" and refused to exchange my purchase.  I understand that every bonsai tree may have been shaped differently but mine hardly has any shape at all; it is not artistically styled to be a bonsai tree, it is basically a slim twig stick inside a ceramic container.  I guess you have to be so lucky to receive a decent tree as shown in the picture.  Awful experience, I am very disappointed! Disappointed 2 1 
We had been eyeballing this on the shelf for a couple weeks at the local grocery store and were thrilled to get it to review.  My favorite cereals are Honey Nut Cheerios, Honey Bunches of Oats, or Crispix.  If it is my birthday or a camping trip and I am going to indulge in a sweet cereal I prefer Frosted Flakes. Cereal tends to be a sweet breakfast treat, and not a staple in our home, so I can overlook the nutrition facts.<br /><br />Probably the best way I could describe Kellogg's Crunchy Nut is "greasy Kix."  It left a funky aftertaste and slime on my tongue.  The flavor, even before the aftertaste, wasn't good, though it was not the most horrible cereal in the world.  It was edible so I gave it an one star more than something... inedible.  My son thought it was ok, though not a favorite, but this seems to be packaged as an "adult" cereal so his vote doesn't count.  I was done after my first bowl and let him finish the rest over the course of two weeks.  This is unusual in my house as we usually go to blows on who gets the last bowl of cereal.  Even my son did not ask to repurchase!<br /><br />Unfortunately this failed for me.  Sorry Kellogg's! Greasy Kix? 2 5 
I ordered the chocolate hemp shake hoping that it would be easier to drink (or for that matter, to keep down) than the bulk protein powder, but I was not impressed. The only liquid I seem to be able to get this to mix into without having large lumpy chunks was coffee-hot coffee. I'm not sure what the high temperature does to the protein, so this left me a little frustrated. If you want hemp protein I would actually suggest just buying the bulk protein and dealing with the bad taste. Mixes poorly and tastes bad-but a good source of fiber and protein 2 3 
Syrup was not terrible, but as other reviews have mentioned, the chocolate flavor is a bit too subtle for my liking. Also, while I love other flavors, this one has a slightly odd aftertaste. A bit lacking 2 3 
OK.  I admit it.  Cats can be finicky.  They can be very picky about wet food, so I wouldn't write reviews about canned, wet food.  But treats are another matter.  I've tried a lot of treats.  Usually, one of my three cats will eat the treats.  I have one who is picky, one who isn't particularly fussy and one who is a chow hound.  I keep seeing healthy treats and trying them.  I am such a fool!  As my cats started getting older, I worry about their mobility.  I tried some Omega-3 salmon oil and that was a fail.  I tried some of these treats.  Not one cat would eat them.  When I leave food out for them, sometimes it will eventually get eaten.  Not these.  So I gave them to an office mate at work who has two kittens.  Neither of his cats would touch these treats.<br /><br />I can't attest to the effectiveness of these treats.  But if you are looking for a healthy treat, try another brand.  It seems that these treats are disliked by lots of cats.  I'll give two stars instead of neutral three because so many cats won't touch these treats.<br /><br />What's a good Cat Parent to do?!<br /><br />PS.  My cats all like Whisker Lickins tartar control treats, so I've signed up for an Amazon subscription for them since they price is the best.  I think you would be hard pressed to find a cat that does not like the WL treats.<br /><br />PPS. Every one of my cats loves Trader Joe's Tuna for Cats and it was the only food my deathly ill cat would eat for several weeks.  It probably saved her life. Five strikes against these treats 2 5 
i assumed since Lorann seems to be the market leader in the cake & candy semi-pro flavorings arena, that this would be an excellent product.  I was making a lot of milk shakes with the standard McCormick strawberry flavoring, found in most grocery stores, which worked well but was getting expensive.  I thought this might help me save some money.  Boy was I wrong.  No matter what I did, I couldn't get anything resembling a strawberry flavor.  I couldn't believe it, so I literally titrated the stuff into a glass of whole milk with one tablespoon of sugar added.  Drop by drop.  2-3 drops wasn't too noticeable.  By 9 to 10 drops, there was a horrible chemical mouthfeel, almost a mouth burn.  It was as though I was drinking Kodak film developer or something.  Maybe there was the slightest hint of strawberries, but nobody would have found it palatable. Avoid buying unless you know for certain it will work...I'm giving it 2 stars instead of one because I can't be sure it doesn't somehow become edible after certain cooking or processing steps. carefully consider your intended use of this product 2 1 
My dog would not eat these bones.  Nor would my cats.  They were so tiny.  Maybe the size of a treat for a hamster or guinea pig.  And way too expensive. Mini bones 2 1 
Not sure if this was AUTHENTIC Cosmic Catnip, as it had a lot more larger bits of stems and coarse material. My cats had loved this stuff when I had gotten a small sample from a local pet store. So, I thought it would be a great idea to get this larger size, but the catnip was not the same. My cats barely like this stuff and it even hurts my fingers when I pinch it to release the aroma. Would not recommend this 3 oz size! Not The Same as Store bought?? 2 1 
On an empty stomach, in a controlled environment, with plenty of water, I felt no physical change to stress levels, at least not the way that you feel an immediate sense of relaxation from Xanax. Like homeopathic medicince (highly diluted), this product is bunk.<br /><br />But it tastes good, and maybe it could have a little placebo effect. Tested it's Effects: None 2 3 
I had hoped that this would still have a rich flavor without an acidic burn, but it just tasted bland, old, and stale.  I actually couldn't drink an entire cup and threw out the rest of the package I got as a vine member. I typically prefer a rich, strong flavor but often bold coffees have too much acid. This had no richness or flavor. bland and boring 2 1 
The first time I ordered this, it was great.  After adjusting my grind, it made the perfect espresso with a thick crema.  However, subsequent orders left much to be desired.  Some were OK... Some were horrible... None were great. Inconsistent Quality 2 3 
Let me start with a few things. I love Nong Shim's Shin Ramyun. I am also a big fan of kimchi. So I thought what could be a better combination than that? So I ordered a case of these from amazon during the back to school sale. I must say I was very disappointed. First of all the noodles are more of the traditional ramen noodle, not the thicker type you get with the Shin Ramyun. (So disappointment #1) Then the flavor of this was not good at all, it wasn't like adding kimchi to a bowl of the Shin Ramyun stuff at all. To be honest the flavor was quite off putting. Now I have a case of these noodles I have no idea what to do with. Flavor is just not there. 2 1 
I really wanted to like this product.  The other reviews were outstanding.  However, no one in our family liked the flavor and mostly the smell of the sauce.  I would rather make my sauce from scratch.  I will not be purchasing this product again. Funky taste and smell 2 1 
This blend makes a very weak tea. I tried it because it was less expensive than the Numi brand Genmaicha. You get what you pay for here. It has none of the depth or flavor that Numi has. I would not recommend this tea. Weak Tea 2 1 
THESE TWISTS ARE STILL IN MY FOOD PANTRY...NEVER TO BE ENJOYED...I HAD PREVIOULY USED TWIZZLERS HERSHEY PRODUCT BUT THEY CHANGED THE RECIPE AND WERE NOT VERY GOOD...I THOUGHT THESE MIGHT DO AS A SUBSTITUTE BUT I WAS WRONG...POOR TASTE AND TOO HARD TO SATISFY ME. KENNYS CHOCOLATE TWISTS 2 1 
I have drank Bigelow band peppermint tea and loved it.  But, by current supermarket doesn't carry Bigelow's peppermint tea and I figured how different can they be..after all the ingredients on both is "Peppermint".  I was very surprised to find Celestial Seasonings peppermint tea is very weak tasting.  I am using two tea bags just to get more flavor.  Also, there is a subtle difference in the taste of the two teas.  Bigelow's brand has a slightly sweeter taste, which I enjoy.  In the future I will not be purchasing Celestial Seasonings peppermint tea. Meh..I've had better 2 3 
These have a good kick, come in nice packaging, and have an initially good flavor, but they have a sour aftertaste that leaves a nasty flavor in your mouth that lingers.  Not exactly what I think of when I think of Cherry Jelly Bellies.  However, they do give you a quick shot of energy. Good Kick, but funky flavor 2 3 
This is just fat, pure fat, made from soy bean oil.  And, it's too hot for me.  If you don't care how many calories you pour over your food, and that those calories are all fat calories, you won't care that this is so incredibly high in both.<br /><br />I don't like hot stuff.  A little bit of tang is a good thing, but all I tasted in this is hot.  I really didn't taste the flavor at all.<br /><br />This is a pass for me. High Calorie, High Fat - Hot 2 1 
Hmm. I don't doubt these ingredients are good! But my cats don't love this and one of them only eats the 'gravy' part and ends up with really bad diarrhea. So...I guess my two are just picky since it seems to be a hit with others! Diarrhea and such. 2 3 
These are a pleasing size and retain a good texture, without the "rubber eraser" taste when chewed for a while, but all the various colors taste the same, with no decernable fruit flavors.  The purple (grape?) may have a slight tang.  They are not overly sweet, which is good, but have no interesting flavor(s).  A disappointment. what about flavors? 2 3 
While I received what I was looking for, the picture showed six sticks and the description said that the shipping weight would be 12.8 oz.  When it arrived it was ONE 12" stick, weighing ONE oz, and in a box that weighed nowhere near 12 oz.  For this I paid over $5 shipping.  The ad was misleading for not indicating exactly what would be received.  Additionally, this is the same picture that they show for some they sell for 4x the price and a shipping weight of 16 oz.  The shipping cost for this item is the same.  I would be hesitant to order this item for fear that I would not know what I would be getting. Great Product, Misleading Ad 2 1 
I got this to go with the HCG diet - Not much flavor.  I tried chocolate and English Toffee - both had more flavor.  Difficult to find in stores -and much more expensive in stores.  Worth it to have a different flavor - but if only buying a couple buy a different flavor.  Ones that come in packages of 2 are a better deal.  Find a friend and split! Not much flavor 2 3 
This item was cute, but had absolutely no appeal to the 2 five month old Labs I have. They picked it up once and that was it. Basically, money wasted!<br />The company offered to take them back, but the postage would cost about the same as the item, so I declined.<br />Note: I've purchased several of the Nylabone products (toys to bones, etc.) for my pups, from 10 weeks old to their current 7 months, they have yet to use any of them at all.<br />Might work for some, but I ended up giving them all to the humane society. Cute, but puppies didn't use it. 2 1 
Over the years I've had the pleasure of receiving jumbo cashews as gifts. These cashews, unless the USDA has changed their grading standards are not jumbo. Furthermore, the bags are uniformly filled with maybe 10% broken pieces some in half, others broken and split. The thing is, when you look at the broken pieces it's clear that they are not the same size or grade as the whole cashews. Cheat! The nuts also had a taste that was that of Cashews that have spent some time in warehouses. The nuts are not terrible, but the consumer is being cheated by paying a premium for a very average product. Not recommended. Over priced, and underwhelming 2 1 
*Previous lists don't mention the French Vanilla, which was incl.<br /><br />I've enjoyed quite a few varieties of Timothy's (and others)K-Cups and had little to no problems with them. Cinnamon Pastry is one example of a coffee I really enjoy.<br /><br />This variety pack however seems to be a mix of their least popular blends, or perhaps the batches that were slightly "off". And going off this experience I won't be trying any of the coffees in the pack on their own except for the Kona & Breakfast blends.<br /><br />The tastes were dark (burnt), bitter and unappealing, each cup made me regret my choice to reach for the coffee mug. Not to mention the after effects were not pleasant, I actually could feel the crappiness of these blends for hours.<br /><br />The French Vanilla was downright disgusting, I don't think they could decide if they wanted to make a soft vanilla flavor  or a strong vanilla liquor experience and it's a horrible mix of the two.<br /><br />Also, as previously mentioned, nearly half the box is NOT coffee but tea's that sound... more interesting than appealing.<br /><br />So if you're in for an adventure and don't really care about the taste of your coffee or tea, go for it!<br /><br />Otherwise... consider sample packs directly through the coffee company, they cost less and give you better options. Not a fan! 2 3 
I've been buying Jet Fuel for over a year and really like it. So, buying the 50 pack seemed to make sense. Amazon's list price is $27. The third party sellers start at $45. Need I say more? Buy it somewhere else. Great coffee but the price is a rip off 2 3 
Hi, this would be better if it was not as sweet with such an aftertaste, it tastes like saccharin and is a bit overpowering. Regatta Diet Ginger Beer has an aftertaste 2 3 
We fed Canidae to our two dogs for almost 5 years--they always ate it eagerly, never had stomach upset, and got raves from the vet for their muscle, weight, and coats.  It *was* a 5-star food.  But last summer we opened a fresh bag of kibble (same exact packaging bought from our usual store) and immediately noticed it was much lighter in color than previous bags, but we fed it anyway. Within a day our Aussie, who has a bulletproof stomach with absolutely no digestive issues, began to have horrible gas, softer stools, and really loud, liquidy gurgling noises in his abdomen.  We continued to feed the entire bag, thinking that he'd adjust to it eventually because our other dog was fine.  Well, our Aussie never did adjust to it; he spent a month having those symptoms, and we dreaded mealtimes because of the stench and sounds he'd create.<br /><br />The kibble in the next bag we bought was the old normal shade of brown, and our Aussie's stomach noises, soft stools, and awful gas went away practically overnight. But by then I was hearing and reading that Canidae had developed a new formula that was making dogs sick. The stories about people whose dogs got *far* sicker than ours, and the dodgy responses that those long-time customers got from Canidae when they called to complain about the unannounced change, made us decide it was time for a new dog food.  We went with Healthwise, a premium kibble made by the same company that makes Innova, California Natural, and Evo.  It's not worth it to continue to be loyal to Canidae and to risk our dogs perhaps getting as sick as many others have.  Read Canidae's new formula horror stories at consumeraffairs.com. After feeding for 5 years, we're done 2 1 
Just tried the Healthy Choice Fresh Mixers Chicken Teriyaki for lunch today. It's easy to prepare. The rice was fine. However, the "sauce", a brown mixture of mushy, small cubes of chicken, and small tidbits of pineapple, was bland, soft, unappealing and fairly flavorless. I wouldn't buy it again. It wasn't bad; it just wasn't tasty, either. At least it's only about 400 calories. I guess I'm not alone ... 2 3 
I thought I was doing the right thing by buying organic and thought Similac was a brand I could trust to be good for baby. That is, until I came across this NY Times article about the sugar they use... [...] Needless to say I'm switching to another brand.<br /><br />From the article:<br /><br />Parents may be buying [Similac Organic] because they believe that organic is healthier, but babies may have a reason of their own for preferring Similac Organic: it is significantly sweeter than other formulas. It is the only major brand of organic formula that is sweetened with cane sugar, or sucrose, which is much sweeter than sugars used in other formulas.<br /><br />No health problems in babies have been associated with Similac Organic. But to pediatricians, there are risks in giving babies cane sugar: Sucrose can harm tooth enamel faster than other sugars; once babies get used to its sweeter taste, they might resist less sweet formulas or solid foods; and some studies suggest that they might overeat, leading to rapid weight gain in the first year, which is often a statistical predictor of childhood obesity. Read this article first 2 1 
I did not like the flavor at all.  A bad aftertaste.  Love the other flavors but this is not a favorite apple orchard blend 2 1 
The ingredients are great but my cat's litter box smelled HORRENDOUS all the time that she was on this food.  I know diet changes sometimes cause a temporary issue, so I kept on giving it to her hoping it would resolve itself after her digestive system had time to get used to the new food, but it was equally stinky all the way to the end of the bag.<br /><br />She was on another high quality grain free food (Wellness Core) before this, I just wanted to try something different so she'd have some variety, but unfortunately this won't work.  Maybe it's just my kitty and maybe it'll work for some other cat.  The ingredients seem really good.  Good luck! Stinky poo 2 3 
I was trying to increase my consumption of coconut products without increasing my intake of sugar.<br />Unfortunately this pina colada mixer has ~ 22 grams of sugar (sorry I don't have it<br />in front of me, but it was way over what I allow in a day), so I won't be buying it<br />again! Tasty but too much sugar 2 3 
I ordered a 12 pack for $24. Pretty expensive considering its a bulk order.<br /><br />I rolled the dice on this flavor. I dont care for it at all and its only 20% coconut water (from concentrate)<br />Maybe the other flavors are better, but I wont be paying another $24 to find out. Not a pleasent taste & only 20% coconut water (from concentrate) 2 1 
Is not bad but is not that good neither, for me it taste like a cherry juice, the taste of the black cherry is strong very strong sometimes taste like fermented cherry I didn't like the flavor. Taste like fermented cherry 2 3 
After trying the Chocolate Peanut Butter flavored Arctic Zero which was pretty good, the Cookies and Cream flavor was a huge disappointment. As previously noted it is a strange color and the taste is absolutely nothing like Cookies and Cream. It is really sweet but in the worst way possible and I will not be purchasing this pricey product again. Would not buy again 2 1 
I am posting this because unfortunately Amazon does not show the label, ingredients on many items.  Since you can not see it, many would assume that this is just dried fruit.  It is not.  It is fruit dried with sulpher.  For some this may not be an issue (but you should know that it is there nonetheless).  I have developed sulphur allergies over the years (you develop allergies via exposure) and with more and more mass produced bulk items containing sulphur, likely many more people will too.  I have had some pretty serious health consequences of same.<br />We can get these locally very inexpensively (I am in Hawaii) and would never purchase this particular brand because of the sulphur.  I did buy it once without thinking, and they tasted bitter, acrid, nowhere near as good as we get in local shops, health food stores.  I realize that tropical fruit is not easy to get everywhere, but there are good healthy alternatives.  Consider, for example: <a href="http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/B001HN5O3C">Woodstock Farms Mango Slices, Unsulphured, 8.5-Ounce Bags (Pack of 4)</a><br />i was browsing here, hoping to get better prices (and access) on bulk dried fruit, but can see that the lack of labeling info is going to cause me a problem :(  I guess my only alternative until other customers specify what is on the label, is to buy things specifically labeled "unsulphured".<br />If you do not have allergiews or sulphur related health problems (yet) maybe consider comparing the 2.  Sulphured fruit is bitter, leaves a chemical aftertaste and is overdried making it taste a lot less fresh (which it generally is) and tougher.  In my experience, this particular product is the worst offender (at least that I have encountered).  It is heavvily sulphured and really tastes off. SULPHERED! 2 1 
Well, lets say that I wish that I had heeded the warning of other reviewers. Since there were so many great and so many bad reviews, I didn't know what to make of it all - thought that possibly this was a fair cup of coffee, but that other reviewers had above average tastes in coffee. Nope. They're just regular old coffee drinkers like me that just don't want a funky taste, and funkier aftertaste. Not too much to ask from a finely brewed cup of coffee. I bought the French Roast...reviews of Fog Chaser were worse stating it tasted like dishwater, ashtray, etc.<br /><br />Let me start by saying, other reviewers are correct that once you open the sealed bag, you must contain them in something else because it will not stay fresh. I just put mine in an empty coffee container because I am just lazy with my coffee...that is afterall why I own a Keurig...ease of use and a quality cup of coffee. Once I opened the outer sealed bag, I couldn't help but think it smelled like something that may have washed ashore on the San Francisco Bay!! I did approach it with an open mind, however, and brewed a cup of coffee.<br /><br />It is easy to use just like traditional k-cups, despite the uniquely different design. I did get coffee grounds in my cup (really just a few), and that has happened to me before so I did not want to fault the product for that. As for the taste...that's where I fault the product itself!!! I gave this two stars because it is drinkable. Barely. I will fight my way though this pack, and never order again!! Let me put into this context for you...the coffee that I have drank at work from the old, stained coffee maker with some cheap store brand grounds thrown in tastes way better than this.<br /><br />There are other ways to save a buck with your machine...there's that giant gray bullet looking filter contraption, there's a small red plastic version, there's the snap on lids, and then there's the aluminum foil that someone recently introduced me to. So here goes...I'll give you a break down of all that I've listed.<br />Giant Gray Bullet Filter - Does NOT taste anything like a traditional k-cup brewed cup of coffee, but by FAR better than this coffee here! The downside with this is that you have to push out the inner part of the machine that the k-cup usually rests in. Dishwasher safe though.<br /><br />Small Red plastic and metal mesh filter - tastes closer to a traditional k-cup, and no popping out the machines inner parts. Have to dump grinds into garbage, but it is dishwasher safe. Good option. Also sold on Amazon.<br /><br />Snap on lids - Amazon sells snap on metal or plastic lids. I have the metal ones. With these, you have to peel the foil off of your k-cup after first use and dump out grounds, and clean them out. Sounds like a hassle, but I guess that I've gotten used to it. Put two scoops of any coffee grounds that you like, snap the lid on, put it in your machine and brew as usual. Out comes a good quality cup of coffee that tastes the same as the traditional k-cup. Possibly because the filter and the cup are what you are reusing. Now someone recently told me that you can reuse the same k-cup over and over again, until the filter gives out. Haven't tried yet.<br /><br />Aluminum Foil - first of all why didn't I think of that!! A k-cup only has a small piece of foil on top that the machine pierces. Really. So obvious that I can't believe that I never thought of it. Tried it the other day. Here's the scoop...still have to empty out a k-cup as you would with the above methods, add coffee grinds, etc. Tore off a small piece of foil, tried to get it just right around the lip because you can't just slap foil over it and have it fit in the machine with all of the excess foil...so it started to feel like a bit of a craft project. Once I got it to fit, I brewed a cup of coffee that tasted like what I have come to expect from a Keurig machine. There were a few grounds that fell into the coffee, but no more than with this crappy coffee!! I will perfect this aluminum foil method...measure, and pre-cut circles one day when I have time.<br /><br />Truly, I have no spare time, which is why I RARELY review a product, but I felt strongly enough about this terrible product, that I should save someone else the palatal distress! Not worth the money! Not worth feeling like you wasted your money when you throw them away! Not worth having to endure 36 cups of sub-standard coffee!! Again I'm no no connoisseur...just a regular coffee drinker! There are other ways of saving money with a Keurig machine! 2 1 
The product is advertised as "6-7 Inch" bones.  Printed beneath the UPC code on the bags is "8 PK 6-7" Bone".  But I could immediately see without opening a bag that the bones were not the advertised size.  The real size range was 5 to 5-1/2 inches (to confirm my visual estimation, I grabbed my tape measure and measured their lengths).  Not ONE single bone was 7, or 6-1/2, or 6 inches.<br /><br />When you have a large dog, the size of their dog chews determines how long they will last.  I hate being lied to - no matter what a "deal" this product may be for others.<br /><br />If you want true-to-size 7" rawhide bones, get "Healthy Hide" brand beefhide treats.  They're made from free-range, grass-fed beef, and are HACCP & ISO certified.  And you also won't be ripped-off by deceptive marketing. Bone sizes not as advertised. 2 1 
Third time I've bought this brand,,,it is STALE,,not gonna bother to return it,,,no second chances, will find another brand. I'm sure another brand offers the same size. To be clear, the first boxes were fresh. Take your best shot. STALE 2 1 
I was hoping to enjoy a raspberry iced mocha with this but, it tastes like cough medicine. Stick with Monin and Torani if you want to enjoy your flavoured mochas. Cough medicine 2 1 
I buy these cookies for company.  I opened one and the chocolate was melted to the wrapper and the cookies were broken in three places.  I am not serving this to my company.  Not happy with the way they arrived.  That's okay I only have 25 to get rid of.  They should know their product and that it wouldn't be good to send it to Nevada in 104 degree weather.  I don't know what to say about the pieces they showed up in.  ASfter putting them in the freezer the chocolate was still stuck to the wrapper.  People in the SW don't buy these cookies in the summer. Not fit for company 2 1 
I was really looking forward to having this little snack arrive.  However, when I tried it for the first time, I tasted an unexpected flavor.  After trying it a few times and then disecting it, I realized that there were raisins in it.  Unfortunately, no one in my family likes raisins.  After checking the list of ingredients on the website and the product package, there is no mention of raisins. Putting all of that aside, I think this product would be tasty to those of you who like raisins.  I must warn you that I think the presence of the raisins make this Pecan Honey Crunch more like Pecan Honey Chewy.<br /><br />Amazon's cutomer service was quick to respond and helped me fix the problem.  Thanks, Amazon! I wasn't expecting raisins in the product 2 1 
Amazon.com packed this product very well and the package was not damaged during shipment.<br /><br />The Vito Coco product I ordered and received (as titled) was not as good condition.  On 4 of the 34 oz boxes, the seals were broke slightly.  All 4 with broken seals were dripping very slightly - very noticeable as I held onto them.  The slight pressure used to hold them caused the dripping out of the seal before ever removing the seal. Two of the containers was smashed on the top - both of which were 2 of the 4 with broken seals. When I opened some of the shipping packages of these products, it smelled moldy.<br /><br />The seal for the opening is flimsy and could easily be damaged. Some of the seals were far too easy to remove - not the kind of seal you want to use for this heavy weight - 34 oz product.<br /><br />I only have one other coconut water to compare this product to, and that is the brand O.N.E.  Compared to O.N.E., the taste of this product was off - a taste of decay or mold. Some tasted moldier than others. I drank them all anyway (with no apparent ill affects), except for 3 of the 4 in which the seals were broken.  3 of the 4 with broken seals, I poured down the drain.<br /><br />The price of the 34 oz 6 pack product of Vita Coco is excellent in comparison to other coconut water brands on the market, but is it worth it?  Not to me.  I will not be buying this product again unless they improve IF the price remains the same. Vita Coco 100% Pure Coconut Water, 34 oz  Boxes pack of 6 2 3 
I tried this illy issimo Caff&egrave; Italian Espresso Style coffee drink for a quick energy lift after lunch. The drink is made in Denmark (not Italy) and distributed by the Coca-Cola Co.<br /><br />Likes:<br />>The AL can chilled quickly (1.5 hrs) in the fridge OR pour in a glass and heat it up in the microwave.<br />>Richer taste of Arabica coffee than <a href="http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/B002IEVJRY">illy issimo Coffee Drink, Cappuccino, 8.45-Ounce Cans (Pack of 12)</a> without the fat and cholesterol (from lowfat milk).<br />>Per 6.8oz. can: 10g sugar, 0mg cholesterol & fat, and only 50 calories.<br /><br />Dislikes:<br />>Each 6.8oz. can contains: 155mg caffeine and 20mg sodium.  Not bad but for those who are very sensitive to caffeine, even 155mg could cause an extra hour or two of insomnia (happened to me, drank it around 2PM, stayed up until 2AM).<br />>Easy to exceed the maximum daily intake of 500mg caffeine (as recommended by physicians) with just three to four cans.<br />>Competitively priced at $2.01 per 6.8oz can (12-pack) but costs can add up quickly for heavy coffee drinkers.<br /><br />Bottom Line:<br />Tasty drink for an occasional energy boost but not recommended for people sensitive to or trying to minimize caffeine intake.  Give it a try, some may enjoy the flavor and couldn't care less about the 155mg caffeine; make your own informed decision! Worthy entry into the crowded Energy Drink market. 3 4 
I consider this in the category of what should be quick, easy, edible food. However, the instructions are a bit more complicated than I like for food in this category. If I open this box, it is because I am short on time and need something quick and easy. However, here are the instructions:<br />1. Brown 1 pound of chicken (cut into 1 inch pieces) in a large skillet<br />2. Add 2 1/2 cps of water, seasoning and pasta. Bring to a boil<br />3. Cover and stir often for 7 minutes. Add broccoli; cover and cook until most of the water is gone, about 2 - 4 minutes. Remove from heat.<br />4. Add cheese with Velveeta cheese sauce pouch. Stir in cheese sauce<br /><br />Since some of those steps actually have multiple steps embedded inside them, this goes from and easy dump and heat meal to a more complicated recipe. For the same amount of work I can this same meal - just with fresh broccoli and ingredients I can actually pronounce.<br /><br />Now, I am no food snob - I actually enjoy the microwave version of the Velveeta broccoli and cheese pasta. Its just that the instructions for that meal is simply open the cup, dump in the broccoli dust, fill to line with water, microwave and stir in cheese sauce. For this amount of effort, the pretty much a similar product - I will pass in the future.<br /><br />Now, if you just really like the taste of Velveeta over other brands of "cheese sauce" and want a meal where all you have to do is add chicken - this is for you. However, this doesn't fit the bill for "quick and easy" and the flavor doesn't compare to fixing the same meal, in the same amount of time - with fresh or frozen broccoli and your own spices. Don't get me wrong, it isn't terrible; just not the ease I would be looking for in a box. Okay, but a little more work than I like 3 4 
I bought this because I felt I wasn't getting enough vegetable in my diet at college, and I'm sure that it has done a terrific job stuffing my system full of nutrients, but I am always hesitant to take it because of a few reasons.  First of all, as I'm sure must be expected, this powder (when mixed with water, of course) has a god awful taste. Thankfully, the drink doesn't taste all too bad in the moment, but the aftertaste leaves you looking remarkably like a cat wheezing out a hairball. This might be due to the fact that the powder doesn't dissolve fully into the water, and instead all sifts down to the bottom of the glass, such that when you reach the end of the drink you're literally drinking a gritty green sludge (even if you stir vigorously and then drink it immediately). The only other reason that I have any qualms with this product, is because you're forced to use so much water to mix it into, that you overload your stomach with liquid and it sloshes about for a surprisingly long time. This always leaves me feeling nauseated, and I always end up burping excessively and having the fight the urge to vomit.<br /><br />All in all, I'm happy this product exists, but I wish there was some way to make it dissolve more effectively, or simply taste ever so slightly better. I've heard that mixing in a packet of Emergen-C does wonders for the taste, and I've also considered mixing the powder into something like apple juice to help the taste.  In any case, I'd still consider it a worthwhile product with just a few understandable drawbacks. Worthwhile, but gross 3 2 
Tastes good, but barely any protein. If you want protein, get Nutiva's unflavored 50% protein powder. You can flavor it yourself. It's cheaper and has more protein. Chocolate HempShake 3 2 
The rainbow chip is okay. Everyone one in the family felt the Pillsbury Funfetti tasted better. I had high hopes for this product, because it looks delicious unfortunately looks can be deceiving. It is not disgusting, just not tasty enough to justify purchasing it again. Not as good as Pillsbury Funfetti 3 2 
I enjoy Bigelow Teas and was looking for a stronger cinnamon influence.  It is very good, hot or cold. I will use it all, but perhaps stir with a cinnamon stick for deeper flavor. Cinnamon Tea 3 4 
K-cups are marginally better than good coffee that I can buy at the store for 1/2 the price or less. This product was offered at $19.95 and I was willing to purchase it but it immediately went up to $26.95. It is not really worth $19.95 and is certainly not worth any increase. Additionally, what's the deal on offering INSTANT COFFEE in K-cups for $15.99 leaving us to think it's a good deal on REAL coffee. Do you want to lose our trust (business)???? That's a good way to do it!!!!!!!!!!<br />jb Wolfgang K-cup 3 2 
This plant type is easily stressed and it was stressed when I received it. After a few weeks, It is doing fine.  The plant came in bloom; this was different then the other desert roses I have purchased from other sellers.  It is making itself at home in the bright Florida sunshine.  Doesn't need much water and love sunshine what a good plant. OK for the price 3 4 
I was hoping the Timothy French Roast K-cups would be as good as the Tully's French Roast K-cups; but, in my opinion it is not.  The Tully's FR is much bolder and more flavorful.  I have a standing order for the Timothy FR that I am going to cancel. Not a bold French Roast 3 2 
My kids love macaroni and cheese with dinner. They even like broccoli. I thought that this would be right up our alley.<br /><br />The broccoli: The broccoli is more of a seasoning that a real part of the dinner. I know, I should have expected this. But when I poured the little, dry broccoli pieces out, I had a bad feeling. Sure enough, I ended up making some real broccoli to eat along with the cheesy skillet.<br /><br />The noodles: Nothing to really complain about here. If you follow the directions, you pretty much get what you see on the box. Only smaller. I wish they'd stuck with regular macaroni or with shells, but these weren't bad, just not great. The picture on the box really magnifies the noodles too.<br /><br />Chicken: Well, you add your own. So go for it! If you like your food all mixed up, then the cheese coated chicken will be yummy at least.<br /><br />Cheese: The high point of the meal right here! It comes creamy already, no need to mess with the powdery stuff you get in some "meal" boxes. Flavorful, cheesy, and creamy. It's just about all you can ask for in a pre-made "Mac and Cheese" box.<br /><br />Overall: I might buy it again as part of a larger meal. Definitely make your own vegetable to go along. Not horrible, not great, just a quick easy dinner if you are runny late. It's ok, but not really "dinner" 3 2 
We have the pickiest dog on earth.  It took us 3 years to find a food that he would eat a full bowl of on a consistent basis!  When this came and we filled his bowl with it the first time, I fully expected him to possibly take a couple of bites then refuse to eat any more.  I was shocked when he ate the entire bowl then went to his food container, basicly asking for more.  I gave him another cup of the food, he ate most of that before he laid down again.  I was thrilled to find another food that he liked!<br />After 3 or 4 days of him eating this food, he started having REALLY bad gas.  Imagine a 100 lb dog with bad gas laying next to where you are sitting on the couch!  Nevermind, you don't want to imagine that but you get my point.  After 4 days of dealing with the gas from hell we put him back on his old food.  Viola, gas was gone!  Thank God!  I don't know if that's a common reaction to the food but it certainly didn't agree with our dog's tummy.  Good news is that the outside cats like it and if they have gas, too, I don't have to deal with it.  ;-) He likes it but... 3 5 
My 13 months old son generally liked the concept of eating by himself but not this combination of beet, berry and banana. It tastes sour probably it tastes sour 3 2 
Having tried all of the Taco Bell bottled sauces, I have to say this is my least favorite. The chipotle flavor is very powdery, almost chalky, and the overall taste is extremely strong. You don't have to use much of it, literally 1-2 drops on a taco is all you would need, but I found it unpleasant. The other flavors are smooth and well balanced, but the chipotle flavor just doesn't cut it. The consistency of the sauce is good and it lasts a good long time in the fridge, and the 8-oz bottle goes a lot farther than you think it will. very strong with a powdery taste 3 2 
My dogs love Newman's the Chicken and the Peanut Butter treats, but didn't care for these treats.  They are about 1.5 inch square and very difficult to break in two.  I felt they were too big and solid to give to the dogs.  After several attempts to entice them with the treats and no happy response, I tossed them.  I will stick to the other Newman's treats. Newman's Lamb and Barley Treats 3 1 
Olive oil in large bold print on the front of the bag is misleading!!  Olive oil is NOT the main oil the chips are cooked in.  The product has more sunflower, corn and canola oils than it does olive oil!! The ingredients are NOT listed in the description.  I should have known better.<br />There are other, much better "Olive Oil" potato chips on the market that use ONLY olive oil. I was quite disappointed in this brand. Disappointed 3 2 
Does not have a rich chocolate flavor. Tastes a little watery. Not sure who a makes a great cocoa but this is not it. Grove Square Hot Cocoa 3 2 
Well, The smell was not as bad as Redbull but I still had to hold my breath while I drank it. I have no idea what flavor it is supposed to be but it is tolerable.<br /><br />The definite pros are that it did work well. Each can has two servings, I downed them both after a particularly grueling workout. I'm happy to report that I did feel renewed and my energy levels lifted and kept me going for the rest of the day.<br /><br />I would use this product again - however I might add I would prefer a Full Throttle for better flavor. Also what is it with the Soy? Why is soy in this drink? To what end? So I suppose I should add that those with Soy allergies will/should take a pass on this. Not my favorite but it does work 3 4 
I enjoy sodas and carbonated drinks, but don't drink too many of them because I'm trying to consume healthier things.  I was sent a can of The Switch through the Amazon's vine program to review.<br /><br />The smell is very strong, medicine-like, and somewhat unapproachable.  The taste on the other hand is very sweet, and it does have hints of the kiwi and strawberry flavors.  It's a little too sweet for my liking, but I am the type of person who drinks juice watered down.<br /><br />As far as being a "healthy alternative to soda", they do a pretty good job.  There's no HFCS (a big plus), and no artificial colors.  On the other hand, all of the juice in it is "reconstituted from concentrates".  The can says it has "natural flavors" which I always consider a dubious term to hide behind on items claiming to be "healthy".  Also, and 8.3 oz can of "The Switch" has 135 calories, while a 8.3 oz of Coke has roughly 109 calories, so this thing is a sugar bomb (even though it says there is "no sugar added".  No kidding!  It doesn't need it!).<br /><br />If you like really sweet things, then this might be a good buy for you.  As for myself, I don't think I'd go out of my way to try this again. Good, but a little too sweet for my taste 3 2 
I've only used Shake N Bake for pork a few times in the past and decided to let my youngest (he's 10) give this a try.  While I supervised, he did all the work which to say isn't too hard.  It didn't come with a bag so we used a ziplock 1 gallon size. The product is simple to use and a quick fix if you're looking for something that requires little prep work.<br /><br />The taste is the same as I remember and would have preferred something a little spicier and not so heavily coated.  The pork was fairly tender but the coating does make it a bit messy. I thought it was okay but doubt I'll get it again. Simple To Use 3 4 
If you are used to buying the Piggy Twists that are about the size of fat cigars, these are not them.  These come 20 to a pack, but the individual twist is about as wide as a regular drinking straw, and 2/3 as long.  If you have a very small (as in toy breed) dog, they are probably great.  I have two dogs between 50-60 lbs., and these are barely worth pulling out of the bag.<br /><br />UPDATE:  After using all the piggy twists (because I'd bought them), we are now used to this size and actually prefer them to the big cigar-like ones because they don't make such a mess.  I still think they are made for tiny dogs, but they will keep a 50-60 lb dog occupied for a while, too.  Just realize what size you are getting with this purchase, because the product picture does not make it clear. These are super skinny 3 4 
I had high expectations based on some reviews, but aside from the apple, these were mostly blech and my baby did not like them.  The consistency of the squashes was very pasty, and the peas tasted like powder.  I ended up just using them to sneak extra nutrition in other dishes (the squash wasn't bad mixed with mashed potatoes, but I couldn't put in too much or the little guy was on to me!).  The apple was actually a really nice consistency, a little bit of texture and tasted quite delicious.  I definitely recommend getting the variety pack before launching into a big box of one kind.  It's a great idea, but won't work for everyone. OK 3 2 
It is great to have this available as it is gluten free. The taste is okay to good. It does have a taste that I characterize as the taste I expect from a packaged sauce mix. I don't use it as much as I would like to as I can make a better tasting, more satisfying sauce, IF I want to take the time and expend the effort. I don;t always want to take time/effort, so on those times I use these mixes. Could be better; could be worse 3 4 
I did a lot of research and decided to buy this food for my 4-year-old cat. I had been feeding him Royal Canin but he got fat, so I was hoping this food--without fattening grains--would help with that. (Side note: I only feed him a little bit at a time, he doesn't eat that much. But he still got fat.) When I got this and mixed it in with his old food, he didn't eat it at all, or even consider it. I'm not sure if it's because it's new, or because the kibble size is very small. It falls out of his mouth. Also, compared to the other food, it doesn't not smell very attractive (to a cat, I assume). I can barely smell it at all. While I like that, my cat doesn't seem to think it's food. He did eat some last night, but he still meows at me for the other food when I try to give this to him. He picks out his old food if I mix the two. If only they could make it smell better somehow while keeping out bad ingredients, and make an adult version (bigger kibble size), then I think this would be the best food (based on ingredients). Maybe for kittens 3 2 
My original review was pretty harsh, but after a few months I have gotten somewhat used to these and enjoy them more than I did originally. I will restate, however, that Griottines are much better and have less of a fake syrupy taste and hard chewy texture.<br /><br />I bought these at the recommendation of a local liquor store owner, who thought that they were amazing as far as cocktail cherries are concerned. My past preference has been Griottines, which never seem available on Amazon these days (in the larger, more reasonably priced jars). The Griottines are nice small, tender sour cherries. I would suggest finding those somewhere on line in the larger (10+ oz) size, which is more reasonably priced than the small size, or these Luxardo. Do yourself a favor and seek them out. Not my favorites 3 4 
Add these to some hot water and they perk up really really fast and get huge in size compared to the dried version. More so than the tree ear fungus I am used to using. However, these turn pale brown in color and have a different flavor and a bit softer texture than tree ears I have used before.<br /><br />I do like these, but I miss the tree ears that remain black after I re-hydrate them and keep a higher level of crispness when re-hydrated.<br /><br />The price for the quantity of these is good, but the quality is only B level not A level.<br /><br />I probably would get them again because of the price. OK but not great 3 4 
After searching for a more constant and less expensive supply of "real" licorice over my favorite (more about that later), I decided to try this one based upon other reviews and the description. I have to say that I was disappointed. It is not intense enough and a bit too salty for my preference since all that I noticed was salt and more salt until it got down to the licorice flavor which I would charactize as "modest". My all time favorite licorice was discovered years ago while visiting a St. Louis mall has been and remains an excellent choice made by Bissinger's Chocolate Company and they call it French Long Licorice. It is not noticeably salty and packed with flavor without being a sicky-sweet candy. I say that and caution licorice lovers to know their favorite "type" of licorice; this is important when reading reviews and purchasing. I was looking for something not American-style junk candy, with actual licorice extract not anise, chewy, lasting, with true strong licorice flavor and no other flavor overtones.<br /><br />As far a Bissinger's is concerned, they do not make this licorice year round nor advertise it on their website or in their catalogs so you have to call their toll free number and ask if it has been in production. It is expensive but well worth it for excellent flavor and lasting ability (I can enjoy one for at least 15 minutes if I don't chew). These are my favorite thing to have when reading a great book and I limit myself to 2 at a sitting for my "fix"; okay, sometimes 3 if it is a superb book:D.<br />The last time I ordered it they were generous and added a pound of their premium chocolate as a thank-you for being a customer that troubled to find their particular product because I do not live near one of their stores and unless I visit say St. Louis (where it is headquartered) I have to mail-order.Anyway, I prefer my licorice hard and let it soften in my mouth so when I get an order ($56 for 2lbs) I leave it out lightly wrapped for a few days to harden off. That makes it last longer in my mouth and does not affect flavor but that it personal mouth feel preference. It frezes without problems so I will just have to go back to that and pay for my pleasure and stock up :). Licorice-gotta have it! Not nearly as good as Bissinger's French Long 3 2 
I am a huge fan of Two Leaves and a Bud.  They make a beautiful English Breakfast Tea and many others.  I ordered this giant box of White Tea being a Tea lover and especially a White and Green Tea lover.  The idea of Rose Pedals in my Tea was also enticing and I dreamed about early mornings on my deck, sipping White Peony Tea with Angels flying and Songbirds singing.  Not really. But I did have high hopes for this Tea and I was let down.  The leaves are too small, the Tea goes bitter quickly and it's hard to brew as the bag won't immerse easily in the water.  Try Mighty Leaf Teas for real White and Green Teas.  They are almost unmatched in quality.  For more reviews please visit my blog [...] Not Up To My Expectations! 3 2 
I enjoyed the vanilla flavor of this shake.  It was smooth, not gritty.  Although I am not sure I would be a regular user of this.  After a workout I am not concerned with replenishing calories.  If I am I will have a piece of chicken.  Usually I am more concerned with hydration.  I am not knocking this product for its lack of hydration (it is not meant to be used for that), I am just explaining why I would not use it regularly.  I could see that it would be nice if I know I have to run off somewhere and I can having anything to eat.<br /><br />That said, I did not find this shake very filling.  Within the hour I was looking for something else to eat. Good tasting, but not that filling 3 4 
I usually buy this at our local Whole Foods or Harris Teeter it's a great product but when I ordered it from Amazon all but 2 out of 12 cans arrived dented. Amazon quickly replaced the order but in the replacement case 9 cans were dented. That is really unacceptable. They did refund my $ but I really want the pumpkin so I am going to try one more time and order it again and see if I can get a case of undented cans. Too many dented cans 3 2 
Not a good flavor overall. I have only tried the TERIYAKI flavored strips, and hate them. The texture and the sweetness is just gross together. I'm going to try a different flavor before writing this off, but yuck. I'm a vegan by the way, and I've had some amazingly delicious fake-feet products: this is not one of them. Teriyaki flavor primal strips 3 2 
I really like pasta, so I'm probably not a good judge of what's "good" in pasta - I like it all.  That said, I liked this product as far as the food, the taste, etc. goes.  However, I have to say that I really prefer the packaged pasta dishes that Hormel puts out.  With the Hormel products everything in the package is already together.  All you have to do is throw them in the microwave for a bit and you're done - and flavor/product-wise the Hormel packages are just as good as this.  So, in a nutshell - while I liked this product, I really like the Hormel pastas better and will probably stick with those in the future. OK, but NOT that easy to prepare. 3 4 
With two, 5 month old Golden Retriever puppies (and an 8 year old), I was looking for a bag of raw hides at a good price. I realize that the description states 2.5", however the picture makes the bones look like tightly knotted, "normal" sized bones - they are not. They are tiny, almost see-through and take up HALF the length of my palm, and are skinny. The pups devoured the entire bag in less then a week (they were given other treats as well.) I swear when I gave them the first one, they looked at me like "are you kidding??" Lesson learned. If you have a teacup breed, these are the bones for you (that is if teacup breeds even eat raw-hides)!! 3 Stars for Poorly Represented in Picture- For Teacup Breeds!! 3 2 
Recently bought a 24 pack of this new "improved"  stride sweet cinnamon gum.  It tastes more like the Dentyne Spicy Cinnamon gum and gets too soft and sticky in 5 to 10 minutes.  The original stride sweet cinnamon gum is much better and lasts longer. Not as good as regular stride cinnamon gum 3 2 
Anything applesauce-based you can usually get a great deal in the store and combine fruit flavors yourself.  But pears and mangos take just enough extra work that I appreciated the ease of getting this one through Amazon.<br /><br />My twin 10-month olds turned out to be quite cooperative when it came time to eat this flavor brand!  Now I get it by subscription and they'd eat it instead of vegetables if they had a choice.  It is a consistency similar to applesauce, so you have to serve it in a similar way (it's runny).  I have the subscription to the Earth's Best Rice Cereal, so I always have plenty of that to mix in with it if I want.<br /><br />Ingredients per the label: Organic pears, organic mangos, ascorbic acid (vitamin C), citric acid.<br /><br />This has 70 calories, 100% vitamin A, 45% vitamin C and 2% iron.  I've been informed that the percentage of daily needs met is based on an adult. Great!  This is the easiest way to combine pears and mangos for baby food 3 4 
It was a hit/miss, and I think I missed on this one.  Tastes a bit different than I had hoped. Not that there's anything wrong with it, just doesn't taste good to me. :( Not as good flavor as I hoped for. 3 2 
NOTE: This review is for the Chili and Lime Flavor Popchip.  Amazon had a separate page for it but then merged the product and its reviews into one.<br /><br />It's hard to objectively review food since everyone's palate and tastes are different.  So what I can say about this particular Popchip flavor that should be useful for most folks out there is that it doesn't really taste like Chili and Lime you're "probably" expecting.  The Chili and Lime most folks probably are expecting if they grew up on Frito Lay products is very sharp and sweet (and of course artificial) - but it's what we liked if we ate more than a bag.<br /><br />The best way I can describe this flavor is that it has a "tomato" like taste to it with a somewhat tangy sour note that is suppose to be the lime component.  Together they turn into an odd combination that registers other flavors in your mind than Chili and Lime - at least it did to me and others who tasted it with me.  If you eat the skin of a green bell pepper, you can kind of get at what Popchips were trying to do with the Chili taste on this version, but I have no idea how some sour salt can be akin to lime.  For myself personally, I thought it tasted like "Tomato and Basil" you would find on Pita chip flavors and baked snacks.<br /><br />Whether or not you agree with my above description of the flavor, I would highly suggest you try to get this in a sample pack and try it out first.  BBQ + Salt & Vinegar Popchips are still my staples for now. Taste more like "Tomato and Basil" than "Chili and Lime" 3 4 
This cereal was just okay. It tasted a little like plastic. I liked Kellogg's other new cereal in this same genre, but this one just didn't quite cut it for me. It was boring and waxy. I wasn't impressed. So-so 3 2 
I did not realize when I had these sent to me that they were for a pod brewer.  I am glad that is that case, however.  It gave me a chance to test these out in several ways.<br /><br />1. Single Cup Pod Brewer- made weak coffee and it just didn't taste very good,  Tasted burned, weak and unimpressive - the price is outrageous for this quality of coffee.<br /><br />2.  Opened bags and used four of them to brew an 8 cup load in the Bunn Phase Brew 8 Cup coffee maker with the Bunn filter.  The result?  A FANTASTIC cup of coffee.  A medium roast coffee, there is a smoothness with a slightly grassy flavor and almost touch of flowery finish.  This is clearly a low-acid coffee which again was very enjoyable.  This made the perfect strength coffee and we all enjoyed it very much.<br /><br />3.  Aerobie Coffee Press- again made excellent smooth coffee very similar to the flavor of the Bunn brewed cup - with even more silky smooth texture.  I used one pod for one cup of coffee, but I opened it first and used it with the Aerobie Espresso Coffee Press.  Using one pod (opened up and used loose) makes a good small cup of coffee, but to make it stronger, two pods were necessary.<br /><br />There are about 3 Tablespoons of ground coffee per bag.<br /><br />All in all, when used loose, this is a really wonderful cup of coffee.  At the price that it is, however, it is ridiculously expensive.  If they took the Marley name off of it, perhaps they could lower the price down and sell it in loose foil bags, better pods of coffee, or un-ground beans foil packed.<br /><br />As dumb as this may sound, there is not one bit of information about this coffee on the box or the foil envelopes.  There are no instructions whatsoever. If someone had never used a pod coffee maker or heard of one, they might not understand this process at all.  Surely they should have SOMETHING on the box and packets saying that these are only to be used with pod coffee makers.<br /><br />Again, it might sound fussy, but not everyone knows everything, and it would help to avoid mistaken purchases for someone who has no idea what a pod is for coffee.  As you can see from some reviews, the tea style bag is easily misunderstood and used in a fashion like making tea. Pod Brewing - Bleh;  LOOSE Brewing FANTASTIC 3 2 
The makers of Taco Bell Home Originals Bold and Creamy Chiptole Sauce did get the "creamy" part right - though there is no cream anywhere to be found in this bottle, just copious amounts of soybean oil.  This is why this sauce has a whopping 110 calories per 2 tablespoon serving, on par with most regular salad dressings.<br /><br />Unfortunately (or more unfortunately) the "bold" part of the name is an extreme misrepresentation.  Oh, there is some chipotle puree way down on the ingredient list (listed under the label "contains less than 2% of"), but it only lends a hint of chipotle flavor to the sauce.  It's more akin to mayonnaise with a few dashes of pepper added than to a real chipotle sauce - nothing "bold" here at all.<br /><br />As it does have a somewhat pleasant (though overwhelmingly bland) taste, I'll give this Taco Bell sauce a bit of credit.  But I suspect that it would be much better and healthier with a bit less oil and a lot more kick.<br /><br />Note - since people have varying responses to spicy foods, I'll let you know that when I'm at a Taco Bell the "Fire" sauce is my usual choice, and I consider "Medium" and "Mild" to be about as spicy as ketchup.  Perhaps those more sensitive than I to spicy heat will have a better opinion of this sauce than I do. Well, they got half of it right ... 3 2 
This is good as it doesnt have any sugars added. However i found young brand coconut juice better, it does have sugars added though. good but not the very tasty 3 4 
I'm a noodle lover. Can't live without noodles at least once a day. I have more than a dozen different types of noodles stocked in my pantry & I love trying new ones too. I've a subscription to 30 packets of Nong Shim's Gourmet Spicy noodles & was expecting this to be much better. Really, the taste is great. Same type of noodles, texture, etc..same spicy flavor packet but there is another packet of soup seasoning included. There's no dried vegetables packet like the Gourmet Spicy flavor has. No dried vegetables flakes & no beef chunks like the description stated, thus false marketing. The price is too much for this. If this is the new & improved Gourmet Spicy noodles, I'd give it 4 stars. I took off 2 stars because of the unworthy price tag & another star because of the false marketing. I read a comment reply in another review here - A Korean reviewer... I agree entirely. Big hype & price tag but disappoints. I'll stick to the Gourmet Spicy if I were you. Worth the try but not 24 packets!<br /><br />Edit: Not false marketing since it seems like only the very first packet had no dried beef & vegetable so I changed the rating to a 3 star. However, the beef "chunks" are just flakes. Not enough flakes to notice. There are also dried mushrooms. Now, the mushroom pieces are bigger than the ones in the Spicy Gourmet vegetable sachet. Still, not impressed. 1/29/2012 Taste is Great but... 3 4 
I use baking soda for a LOT of household things (cleaning, cooking, personal care, etc).  I was first tempted by this seemingly economized 12 pound bag.  However, when I compared to the smaller containers at my local grocery store - I realized this was not the best way to purchase baking soda.<br /><br />Right now for 12lbs of the generic brand (12, 16 oz. boxes) I would pay just 10.68 (13.08 regular).<br /><br />For the A&H brand I could buy 12lbs in the following ways:<br />12, 16 oz. boxes for 13.80<br />6, 32 oz. boxes for 10.62<br />3, 64 oz. boxes for 8.97<br /><br />That's nearly ten dollars less for the same amount of the same product.  Although the bag is probably more convenient than 3-12 boxes - the boxes are recyclable and the bag is not.  Just some things to think about! Great Product, Bad Price 3 2 
The flour is amazing but the customer service sucks. I have emailed and called the company numerous times with no response. Awesome Flour Crappy Company 3 4 
My dogs didn't like these as well as other Smokehouse products.  They much prefer the chicken tenders or the duck and sweet potato treats.  They still liked them, but just didn't appear as excited as they do with the others Smokehouse products are a great buy 3 4 
Tasted a bit stale.  Not nearly as good as the "waffle" cookies that I loved in Europe, but maybe the product was just not as fresh? Okay - not great 3 2 
I don't think any gummi bears are really better than others. I just wanted to note that this product is listed under "Vegetarian" foods, but they are not vegetarian because they contain gelatin.<br /><br />Just a note. Now, back to your regularly-scheduled Amazon shopping. Not Vegetarian 3 1 
My teens loved it, my husband and I did not. The younger ones liked the extra crunchy peanut taste. Of course what they liked the most was the sweetness. My son felt it had more of a honey taste than sugary and I would agree. They commented that they would like it more as a snack out of the box then in cereal. They still felt that Honey Nut Cheerios was much better tasting with less aftertaste.<br />I thought I was eating caramel corn which I can only tolerate once in a great while and in small doses.  What I was hoping for was that Kellogg's would of listened to all the latest media hype about too much sugar. They didn't. This is way too sweet. I also wish they had used almonds or walnuts in this cereal. The protein to this cereal is only 2g per 3/4 cup. My teens may purchase this on their own but I will not be. I will continue to eat plain Cheerios, adding our own nuts to get some breakfast protein. Mixed Family Review 3 4 
Although my dog loved this, it was really nothing but a canine snack.  The ingredients are appalling, although there are a few  nutrients.  I compromised and gave this a 3-star rating because a) my dog really enjoyed it and b) the lack of nutrients cost this product 2 stars.<br /><br />Even so, while I am glad my dog liked this product, it is doubtful I will get it again as it does not appear to be all that nutritious. Canine Snack 3 2 
This is based on the Donut House base coffee flavor with a supposedly chocolate donut taste. The base Donut House coffee flavor is mild/smooth with a strong bitter aftertaste. It smells great while breaing, like you're in a donut shop but that's where the similarity ends.  The "chocolate donut" flavoring doesn't really come through in the coffee except that the strong bitter aftertaste becomes a strong bittersweet aftertaste.<br /><br />I tried this on both 10oz and 8oz sizes thinking the flavor was being diluted but it only made the flavors more intense... It didn't change the taste of the coffee.<br /><br />If you like the Donut House coffee flavor you might want to give this a try but if you dislike the Donut House coffee I don't think you'll find this any better. Smells great and that's about it... 3 2 
I LOVE dark chocolate so when I saw the reviews of this kind I figured I'd give it a try.  Now taste is a matter of individuality so I'll give you the difference in this Belgian Dark Chocolate by Stephen's and my usual Nestle Rich Chocolate:<br /><br />Belgian:150 calories per serving,  serving is 3Tlb mix and only 3/4 cup water or milk.<br />vs<br />Nestle: 80 calories w/water per serving, serving is 2Tlb mix and a WHOLE cup of water.<br /><br />Belgian: Total Fat 3.5g,  Sodium 240mg, Total Carbs 27g, Sugars 22g, Protein 2g<br /><br />Nestle: Total Fat 3g, Sodium 170mg, Total Carbs 15g, Sugars 12g, Protein 1g<br /><br />I first mixed the Belgian mix as directed but couldn't finish it due to the fact that it was just too sweet for me.  It IS creamy, but just too sweet.  When I use the Nestle I only use 1/2Tlb and a squirt of dark choc. syrup and I'm happy with that.  So I then mixed the Belgian as I do with the Nestle and it's ok.  I can't rave about it due to the fact that it's higher in sugars and sodium than the Nestle and if you are trying to watch those things you might want to take that into consideration.<br />To me dark chocolate shouldn't be as sweet(or sweeter) as milk chocolate, I'm sure that's why I prefer dark chocolate.  I'll even add some unsweetened chocolate powder to my mix at times.<br /><br />But as I've said it's all in your individual taste, I just wish they would have listed the Nutrient Facts along with their ingredients.<br />Not bad, just not all that great if you don't like REALLY sweet hot chocolate. Taste is individual 3 4 
My dogs like these.  The only drawback is that the bite sized morsels tend to disintegrate, leaving you with about 1/3 bag of crumbs.  You can give the crumbs to the dogs, but its kind of a pain. Dogs like. 3 4 
This little can (6.8 oz.)of coffee drink has the flavor of espresso with a not-too-sweet note.  There is nothing artificial-tasting about it, as is often found in other energy boost drinks.  With 155 mg. of caffeine, it contains almost double the jolt in a 7 oz. brewed cup of coffee.  This one's not for sissies.<br /><br />Please note that, with 10 grams of sugar and 12 grams of carbohydrate, it may not be for those on sugar/carbohydrate restricted intake. Other than that, it contains nothing to deem it unhealthy.  It even has no preservatives. (I wonder what this drink might taste like if it were artificially sweetened and have no carbohydrates.)<br /><br />I enjoyed it ice cold straight from the can.  This tastes every bit as good as the Starbucks bottled coffee drinks.  I would not hesitate to choose the Illy brand over the other one.<br /><br />Coca Cola produces it in Atlanta, Georgia under a licensing agreement and it is a product of Denmark. True Expresso Flavor 4 3 
These chips taste great. I use them mostly as a topping on my garden salads I make at home. They give it a great crunch and sweet taste that makes the salad so much better. They also make a great and healthier snack. Original Seneca Apple Chips 4 5 
Delicious and easy to make. I make mine with milk and it comes out extra creamy and rich. You can pour boiling water or hot milk onto the cereal to cook it, or you can heat it in the microwave (be careful about if boiling over. I like the Maple Brown sugar just as much as the Cinnamon. Delicious and easy to make 4 5 
This tea really is just an apple cinnamon tea (with no "spice" flavor included).  It is pretty mild and tasty enough but I wish it was a bit stronger (if it were I would have given it 5 stars).  Typically I drink green tea or chai tea so this herbal tea is something new to throw into the mix.  Shipping was fast and the boxes were well packed. Good flavor, but not my favorite tea 4 3 
these are good :) taste almost like the real thing has vanilla inside tastes awesome  you gotta love the poptarts :D i love poptarts :D not bad :) 4 5 
Received order within 7 business days.  The product received did not have the same label as pictured though the wording was the same.  Also the product did not have the same flavor as the product pictured (which we had bought previously locally).  I suppose the manufacturer has not only changed the label for this product, but also the recipe.  The distributor provided excellent service and we have decided to keep the sauce we received, just have to make our own modifications for our grilled vegetable recipe we have used in the past.  Thanks for another great distributor for the products we like.<a href="http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/B001EO5ZFQ">World Harbors Jamican Style Jerk Sauce, 16-Ounce Bottle, (Pack of 6)</a> Great service 4 2 
I was out of town when I purchased this item. I can purchase the 4-pak at Wal Mart for $1.48 but it's never in stock. That is all my cats will eat so I just purchased it on Amazon cause I've always saved, especially for free shipping. I paid $30.11 for the 12 4-paks. This is the one time I didn't save, in fact it was outrageous what I paid on Amazon. I will continue to shop Amazon but I need to be more careful. 9-Lives Supper Suoreme 4 3 
Behind the 12 packets of Via instant coffee, Starbucks placed a brief message, "Never be without." That's a better marketing strategy than, say, "You could do worse." Instant coffee is still instant coffee and no one who starts his or her day with a cup of Joe is about to trade fresh brew or French press for instant.<br /><br />In a pinch, Via is a portable and affordable option.<br /><br />However, I don't recommend Via as a strategy to save money on your coffee bill. A quality coffee press and a thermos will do much better. The 12-packet order currently sells for $8.95 on Amazon, without special offers or subscribe-and-save discounts. That works out to $0.75 per cup, which is about what you'd expect to pay in a standard vending machine. Hands down, Starbucks Via tastes better than anything pouring out of a vending machine. However, each Via stick produces an 8-ounce cup of coffee so, depending which size you normally order, you might spend $1.50 (for 16 ounces) or $2.25 (for 24 ounces).<br /><br />At $0.75 per 8-ounce cup, Starbucks' Via sticks are the same price as SoloBrew's <a href="http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/B002QTJ70M">French Press To-Go SoloPress</a>, which I also reviewed on Amazon.com. I still recommend both brands as tasty and portable options over the ubiquitous, freeze-dried coffee sold in glass jars.<br /><br />Rating: Four stars. In a pinch, Via is a portable and affordable cup of Joe 4 3 
I really like this product. I have been trying to loose the "last ten pounds" for a few months now. The problem is I am hooked on chocolate. Rather than completely give up on my goal, I have switched to these as a meal replacement. Definitely wish Amazon would get these (and at a reasonable price). They are excellent! Great for a chocolate boost 4 5 
This product converted me, I kid you not. Before: I did not think I liked instant coffee. Now: I think I do! :-)<br /><br />I've tried <a href="http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/B001E50TSS">International Coffee</a> type products, which are powdered drink mixes and not truly instant coffee, and I was never very impressed. Eventually, I learned (and you'll laugh at me for not knowing this) that instant coffee is not a "mix" like hot chocolate but actually coffee beans treated differently in their production from coffee beans intended to be brewed. The bean is roasted as usual, then crushed (rather than cut as for brewing beans) in preparation for creating a coffee "concentrate" that will then be either freeze dried or spray dried. This product (as explained on the Nescafe website) is Robusta and Arabica beans, freeze dried, a method which may or may not be the top choice for connoisseurs of instant coffee, but being new to instant coffee I don't yet appreciate the difference.<br /><br />I do know that the product in these single-serving sticks is the same product that was sold in canisters, before. This is just a new format for their current product, not a new product. And wow, for the sheer pleasure and convenience, it's a decent cup of coffee! It can't be mistaken for richly brewed coffee from a restaurant or from your home coffee machine, not even if you douse it with cream, but instead I compare it to "office" coffee, or 'cafe au cube farm', which it definitely matches in taste and quality. Easy, quick, mellow. Great idea when I'm the only soul who wants a cup of coffee and can't bear to brew just one or two lonely cups.<br /><br />The big disadvantage of instant coffee, as far as I'm concerned, is that a serving of this product has only abut 65mg of caffeine compared to 45-180mg of caffeine in a brewed cup of coffee (we're talking in the upper end the way I brew mine!). I want my caffeine! The flavored versions of this product have even less caffeine per serving (at 25-30mg) although I couldn't tell you why. (This information, by the way, comes from the Nescafe website FAQ.) The other disadvantage, I suppose, is that the whole house doesn't fill with the sound and fragrance of brewing coffee when I choose to go instant. Alas.<br /><br />Still, given the convenience and the decency of the beverage itself, I'm now buying these little "single sticks" pretty regularly! Recommended. :-) Pleasant beverage, convenient format! 4 5 
I bought this canned crab meat for the first time and just used it in a soup. I bought "Pacific Organic red pepper creamy tomoto soup" (comes in cartons) and added a can of strained "mixed vegetables" and a can of this "crab meat", added some old bay seasoning and to tell you the truth, it was pretty good and it only took a couple minutes to make! The crab meat itself doesn't have much flavor at all and living in Maryland, it certainly isn't the crab meat I'm used to but to make a quick inexpensive crab soup it's pretty convenient. I wouldn't just eat this out of the can or make crab cakes with it because it's not high enough quality to do that. I also buy lots of canned goods for "emergency" back up my sister convinced me to always have so this along with the cases of tuna fish and canned chicken breast we should be in good shape in the "meat dept.". crab in a can 4 3 
I love using fresh ginger and lemon when I cook, so when I saw that there was a ginger and lemon drink I had to try it.  While the flavor was good, it did leave a slight after taste, but not enough to deter me from trying it again.  My only complaint is that I received a sample pack of the Gold Kili drink and it did not have any directions as to how much water to use.  I tend to like most of my foods and drinks very flavorful, so I opted for a regular coffee mug, but found it too strong and ended up pouring it into my largest one.  All in all, I thought this provided a nice change of pace for the basic varieties of teas, coffee and other warm drinks that are on the market today. Powerful Flavor 4 3 
To make this simple the tea is perfect!  It's the same refreshing taste I'm used to during my stays in Japan.<br />My previous delivery arrived in near impeccable condition with only one bottle slightly dented.  I have never had problems with products shipped directly from amazon, with the exception of the one I have just received.<br /><br />The wrapping on the bottles was very dirty and deteriorated.  Most bottles remained intact but a couple were dented badly and on the verge of bursting.  The cardboard packaging has obviously been exposed to a lot of moisture and other elements.  I'm not sure what happened.<br /><br />Unfortunately Amazon wont allow these items to be replaced.  I gave it 4 stars because of the tea and at least they are still drinkable.  I might consider canceling my subscription if they arrive like this again.<br /><br />Great product and true to the Japanese original. Just may not arrive 'AS' great. Great tea, poor delivery 4 3 
Chocolate, marshmallow, graham crackers.. there's nothing really more nostalgic than a combination of those three ingredients (s'mores anyone?) bringing back so many young memories. The true beauty of the combination is its simplicity and that it spans so many different countries and cultures.<br /><br />I actually grew up more with moon pies (or choco pies as it is called in Asia) that more closely resembles a s'more by having two graham crackers sandwiching instead of the mallomars single cracker on the bottom. The thing I really like about this version is that it is smaller and much easier to have a small snack or nibble as opposed to the larger alternatives. Sinking my teeth into the fluff first made me enjoy and taste the marshmallow sweetness first which I've come to realize I prefer.<br /><br />The only problem I had was that my package (of 18 cookies) came smushed in the mail so many of my cookies had their layers separated letting me not enjoy the full experience as intended. Small Nostalgic Bites 4 5 
This powdered peanut butter is quite tasty, either on its own or mixed with water as instructed. The problem is, it is about twice as expensive as normal peanut butter wherever you try and find it. I didn't like the price on Amazon, and Bell Plantation's website charges over $11 to ship their 4 pack, which makes the price of each bottle about $7. $7 is also about the price I've seen in specialty stores as well.<br /><br />Unfortunately, while it is a healthy, tasty substitute for real peanut butter, I'll be sticking to the real thing due to the price. Plus, nut fats are good for you as long as they're consumed in moderation. Good, but expensive! 4 3 
When we received our Keurig Elite for Christmas, we were so excited to break open the sample pack of pods to try out different blends and flavors.  Of the 12 pods we had in the box, four were Green Mountain Coffee brand.  I'd never tried anything from this company before, but from what I had researched online, they have the largest range of Keurig pods and have even bought out competitors to produce coffee under their brand names as well.<br /><br />Unfortunately, I was immediately disappointed by the quality of the coffee.  We tried their Dark Magic, Decaf and Breakfast Blend and all were underwhelming, to say the least.  I was almost completely set on writing off Green Mountain altogther.<br /><br />We had one GM pod left and being of the mindset of waste-not-want-not, I figured I'd give it one last go around before forgetting about them completely.  And I'm glad I did.<br /><br />The Nantucket Blend is a perfectly pleasing cup of coffee.  It is nice and flavorful without being thick and pungent (unlike some of the other GM blends we tried).  I added some flavored creamer to it and it almost measures up to our go-to Caribou Blend pods.  Almost.  All in all, this is a very standard cup of coffee which, while it isn't anything new or exciting, is very pleasing and definitely one of the better Keurig options we've been able to test out.  When we run out of all the pods we've accumulated, I'll probably pick up a box of these as well.<br /><br />Now that I know Green Mountain isn't completely disappointing I'll definitely be open to trying a few more of their coffees (with our promotion for getting the bewer we ordered <a href="http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/B004I3Y4IE">Green Mountain Coffee Golden French Toast,  K-Cup Portion Pack for Keurig K-Cup Brewers, 24-Count</a> to try as well) and see how it goes from there.<br /><br />If you're looking for a go-to choice, this is your cup! A saving grace for Green Mountain Coffee... 4 3 
I got this as a gift and liked the flavor but I wasn't crazy about the texture.  I like fluffy pancakes and believe it or not, imo, Aunt Jemima's buttermilk ready mix is the best one out there and it's so easy to make.<br />Of course, the best tasting waffles are made by me from scratch with buttermilk and all.=)<br />Overall, I think buying gourmet pancake mix is one of the biggest waste of money.  And it still requires you to put melted butter, milk, etc.<br />I am sticking with my own recipes and Aunt Jemima's if I am in a hurry. Tasty mixture but 4 3 
I want folks to know that this ear cleaner definitely has a distinct odor, contrary to what the other review says. However, I am buying lots more of this great stuff, as my kitties don't mind it at all and I find it to be very gentle, effective and it really is natural, with only 4 ingredients. Plus it's alcohol-free, so I have peace of mind that it is safe for my babies and not harsh in any way. And I found it for the cheapest price on Amazon - the key is to buy several bottles for lower shipping & you may as well, since it only comes in a 4 oz size! Stock up now! There definitely is an odor, BUT... 4 5 
Have a senseo coffee maker given to me a few years ago. For more than a year, could not find pods sold any more in local supermarkets - even at the big W. Just happened to come across them at Amazon & went on auto-ship every few months for additional savings. I have always liked the French vanilla so no problem there. Still like fresh brewed better but if you want a quick cup of coffee,these are perfect. I'm just happy that I did not jettison the coffee maker & will next look for the Sumatra pods, my other favorite. Senseo pods not easy to find 4 5 
great service and delivery for a really good product. i am constantly looking for a good hazelnut coffee and so far this is the best, along with green mountain... thanks!!! 4 5 
Item arrived swiftly however, a lot of the cans were dented. If you can live with a dent in your can, the product is perfect inside. Highly recommended seller. Organic Canned Pumpkin 4 3 
These noodles are excellent. Be aware that they are not Fried Ramen... these are much healthier. This one was a little basic for me right out of the package, but when i have a craving for noodles, I always make them my own when I cook. I added fresh ginger, tofu, broccoli and soy and these were excellent. I am going to try the mushroom next as they seem to be the ones people give the best review for. Great Noodles! 4 5 
I was pleased with the product's taste and texture, but it didn't make great BMs for me (made them a bit sticky without getting to graphic). I tend to have a sensitive system. I have switched to brown rice because that makes my innards feel better and the BMs better, but it is harder to make sushi with brown rice. Pretty good rice 4 3 
I purchased the Kyjen Dog Games Paw Hide Treat Toy.  Labs are exceptionally smart and I try to give mine, Autumn, a variety of challenging toys.  She loves her chew toys but she needs to be challanged.  First of all she found her toy under the tree wrapped and without a treat in it.  How did she do that?  With encouragement we allowed her to open her toy.  I took it away after she examined it.  While she wasn't looking I put a few treats in a few of the compartments.  It took her a few minutes to figure it out.  Next time, no challange at all.  That is why I only gave it 4 stars.  It was too easy, but I think to some dogs it will be great, others fustrating.<a href="http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/B0043A71PU">Kyjen Dog Games Paw Hide Treat Toy</a> Just too smart 4 3 
It works and the taste is very pleasing. I will order again to get through those occasional sleepy afternoons. Works faster than a cup of coffee. Tastes Great! 4 5 
You know this stuff tastes really good... once you get it to dissolve. I suppose if you have a food processor and can powder it (as its in sugar-esq crystals on arrival) - or can make a liquid variant. Took off one star for the hassle of having to modify it from its original state for use in cold drinks.<br /><br />That being said, does anyone know if the heat + equal parts sugar / water = liquid sugar method will work with Erythritol? Or will the chemical process be different? Great but not perfect 4 3 
We rececived our 50 flavor jelly bellies this week and boy do they taste good. The reason for this has to be because they use natural ingredients to create the flavors. My favorite is Tutti Fruiti (tastes like bazooka bubble gum - go figure). My wife's favorite is root beer. The soda pop flavors are good. My only complaint is the beans arrived all mixed up... is this the shipper's fault - I don't know.<br /><br />So when I saw the flavors scattered across the bins instead of being in each individual compartment I groaned. I even attempted to sort the beans - but gave up after 20 minutes. However, my wife who is much more patient than me spent over an hour to sort the beans and came up with every flavor in the correct compartment except for Jalopeno and Green Apple - which have the same coloring. So watch out when you grab a Green Apple. Otherwise this is a good buy.<br /><br />In conclusion - This comes with a menu for mixing flavors and the kids love them too... Good Stuff but... 4 3 
This popcorn has hulls, which I don't care for. It's not labeled as hulless, so it's not deceptive. I just thought for the price it would be - my bad. I only use the whilry pop popper, so this review is relevant to that method only. It produces somewhat light, crispy popcorn of fairly large size with a real popcorn taste. I did think it would pop larger though. It's good for the coated popcorns I like to make. It's not the best I've tasted though. Fireworks makes some delicious, hulless varieties that have spoiled me, I'm afraid. The company ships fairly fast, and the shipping cost is what I'd expect it to be. I'm ruined by Amazon Prime though, so to pay any shipping at all is a drawback; that being said, for this quality popcorn plus the S&H cost, I won't buy it again - simple as that - and for no other reason than that. Good, but not great 4 2 
Unlike this company's (not) Pretzel Salt, this product is exactly as described. A great fine flake salt that adheres to popcorn and other foods (french fries) wonderfully! Great Salt 4 5 
To say I am no expert on tea is ...well... the truth. My earlier experience with tea was the occassional cup at a Chinese restaurant,or the cup loaded with honey for a sore throat. For me it was coffee, coffee, and more coffee.<br /><br />However,hearing so much about the benefits of green tea,I picked out a box of it at the store and put it up on my shelf.It just sat there. Then disaster struck - I was out of coffee! I remembered the green tea on the shelf and thought what the heck, maybe it will hold me over till I get to the store. I liked it! It gave me an afternoon pick-me-up that I wasn't expecting and even thought it tasted pretty good as well. I don't remember what kind it was as I have been through several boxes of green, various brand and flavors of the tea since then. Then I hit on:<a href="http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/B001BM68QG">Good Earth Tea Green Tea, Lemongrass, 25-Count Boxes (Pack of 6)</a> -see my review for details of the Lemongrass - I loved it. It was the best I tried. Naturally I found the best deal here at Amazon.<br /><br />Next I wanted to try other flavors. This Orange flavored sounded pretty good. It has the added benefits of super anitoxidant(70% more than Good Earth's standard green tea) Japanese teas matcha and sencha. I found both the aroma and taste much lighter than the Lemongrass. The Orange gives just a hint of it's flavor. Other reviewers felt otherwise, so I would suggest to try one box first and if you like it go for this multi-pack. I do agree though that it's great for what ails ya. It's definitly one I would drink for anything from colds and sore-throats to aches and pains of all sorts. I also read that the matcha leaf helps to cleanse the body of toxins.<br /><br />This blend brews up an appealing golden shade. It gives me a renewed and refreshed feel but I also found it to be more calming than the Lemongrass which gave me quite an energy boost.It also doesn't seem to be dehydrating -as coffee can be - with more health benefits.Although I personally prefered the taste of the Lemongrass - my only reason for 4 stars instead of 5 - I still like this one and it is nice to have a litle variety for different moods or needs. And I don't need to add anything.<br /><br />It is caffeinated, but comparably much less then coffee per serving. It may be served hot or as Iced Tea.<br /><br />From the box:<br />Ingredients: Sencha Green Tea,Orange Oil,Green Tea Extract,Natural Flavors,Matcha and Chamomile Flowers.<br /><br />Super Green Tea - 162 mg avg antioxidants per serving.<br />Good Earth Standard Green tea -108 mg avg antioxidants per serving<br /><br />So I still love that morning cup of Java, but now I look forward to my afternoon Green Tea as well.Now I would find it a disaster to be without that! I even took some with me on a recent road trip - just to be sure I had some wherever I went.<br /><br />Remember to breathe,eat healthy and...enjoy the holidays!....Laurie Nice Change Of Pace and Super Antioxidants 4 1 
I'll start off by saying that this gum has a very good flavor. The electric watermelon also mixes in with some sort of banana flavor making a perfect combo. Its a great addition to the 5 collection and would recommend this gum to anybody here who enjoys the 5 gum series. My only negative sight on this item would probably be the lasting time. Flavor only lasts about 10 min, or so then begins to fade.<br /><br />ALSO: Item has only 10 pack not 12, so I had to ask for a refund of $5.00. Be Careful! 5 Prism Gum 4 3 
Not really sure if they really are "power" bones, but my dog loves the taste and doesn't complain! We buy lots of other Zuke's products as well, and my Golden loves them all. Dog loves the taste! 4 5 
This was a gift for my husband.  We love to cook and have been intrigued by finishing salts for awhile.  We've used the white and the pink with good results.  Really liking them. Good salt 4 5 
I really love Cheez-ITs. I can sit down in front of the tv with a box and before I know it, it's half gone. But these were different. I don't know why, but I expected just a little more from this box, and yet it seemed to fall just short of hitting the nail directly on the head. Don't get me wrong, I still enjoyed them, but they left an odd after-taste in my mouth that I honestly wasn't that crazy about.<br />Not much else to say, but I do hope that this review helped you in one way or the other.<br />Enjoy. An okay taste, from a delicious brand... 4 3 
Not really the best tea but not awful either. It is good if you just feel for a cup of tea and don't have anything else. It's okay 4 3 
The names of these juice drinks rarely really reflect the majority of what is actually in them.<br /><br />Ingredients: 100% juice (filtered sparkling water sufficient to reconstitute juice concentrates, apple, grape, kiwi, acerola, raspberry and strawberry juice concentrates), natural flavors, ascorbic acid (vitamin c).<br /><br />I've never heard of acerola and I want to know what the "natural flavors" are.  Anyway, its really mostly apple and grape. Of course, you probably don't want to drink pure kiwi and berry juice, they are just the "flavor".  So, this is a lighter flavored alternative.  I like that the carbonation isn't overdone.  There's just a bit of fizz.  Its sweet, but not horribly.  Its definitely better than soda and I like it better than the other carbonated juice drink that I have tried (other one had too much carbonation).<br /><br />I get irritated that the nutrition facts are so brief.  Surely this stuff provides more vitamins and minerals than vitamin C.  Did they kill the vitamins in the manufacturing process or are they just not telling us what is there.  If its there, you'd think the company would want to advertise it.  If it isn't, where did it go?  (BTW I have this gripe about most nutrition labels).<br /><br />So, its a good drink, probably good for you and definitely better than soda. Its a pleasant fizz 4 2 
My beagle has severe food allergies, especially to anything high in beef and chicken. Alternative meats just give him horrible gas to go along with his itchy skin. This food works WONDERS. A few days after feeding it to him, his itching stopped completely. Not only that, but he has a beautiful coat. I have heard a lot of criticism for feeding my little guy vegetarian food. People say that he's not getting enough nutrients and it's unnatural for a dog to be a vegetarian. I would much rather feed him something with more meat protein, but it would only work if I fed him steroids for the itching. I think the food is the lesser of two evils. His vet says that he's perfectly healthy and there's nothing wrong with a vegetarian diet. My only qualm is this: why does it have to be so expensive?! It's worth every penny, but seriously? And Natural Balance NEVER sends out coupons. Natural Balance - Vegetarian 4 5 
They taste great. Of course they are some what expensive. The lower rating is because of slow order processing and shipment. I ordered this on July 19 it wasn't shipped until July 26 I received it then on July 31. Which was the weekend and we were gone all weekend. So they sat on our doorsept all weekend. But they did put an ice pack in the packaging. So that helped. My daugther came home and found them and put them in refri. right away for me so when I got home and tried one they were fine. I think if you are not in a hurry order them. Otherwise find another source to get these bars. They are good and taste just like a real chocolate bar. Enjoy Life Dark Chocolate Bars 4 3 
I was interested in trying this coffee.  Although I don't have a problem with the acidity in most coffees, when we make a pot of coffee, we often tend to let it sit for several hours while we drink it over time, so we need a coffee whose flavor is able to be consistent for the duration.<br /><br />I was a bit wary of trying a French Roast--my husband and I tend to prefer our coffee on the mild side, and thus we usually drink Breakfast Blend varieties.  Upon opening the package, however, this coffee did not smell overly strong, nor was the flavor overwhelming.  In fact, perhaps due to the low acid, I found it to be a relatively mild-tasting coffee with just a hint of "roastiness" to it.  The flavor did remain fairly consistent over time.  I would not re-purchase this coffee myself, as there are definitely other brands that I prefer, but if you find the acid in coffee to be problematic, this may be worth a try. Makes a decent cup of coffee 4 3 
My cats love it.  It is a bit overpriced though.  And I don't like the epackaging claim that it is made of rice paper.  Now, that sounds all so nice and eco friendly, but the truth is, it is plastic.  Perhaps the outer packaging is layered with rice paper for effect.  This doesn't change the fact that I am stuck with plastic packaging that is not biodegradable, and possible leaching of chemicals into the product.  Nonetheless, I concede convenience of plastic packaging and some inevitability of its use, especially in shipping.  Just, let's not make a misleading claim to give off a wrong impression. a great appetizer 4 3 
This review is for Zuke's Chicken-Flavored treats.<br /><br />The only problem I have with these treats is their overwhelming smell. It's not pleasant at all, almost like they're on the verge of spoiling. I've left the bag open accidentally and returned to the whole lower level of my house reeking. Even after putting them in a sandwich baggy for training during our walking session, the smell clung to my coat. Basically, anything these things touch, they'll share their smell with.<br /><br />Stench aside, these are fabulous treats. My dog responds more readily to them during our training sessions than any others I've tried so far (guess what disgusts me smells like heaven to him). They're also already the perfect size, which is very convenient.<br /><br />I'll definitely try out some different flavors next time. Chicken-Flavored Treats 4 1 
We are glad we found this mix as we make pancakes without eggs for my son who has an allergy.<br />They taste fine for our family- we like them many ways! Good for Egg Allergy 4 5 
I've never bought flavored syrups before but wanted to try them. These six flavors are each 25.4 ounces, are sweetened with Splenda and come in plastic bottles.  There is no pump on the bottles, although you can buy one.<br /><br />I think it's generous to call these "syrup" as they are the consistency of water.  But the flavors are bold, and if you're careful pouring they will last a long time.  We've experimented with the vanilla, hazelnut classic, caramel, chocolate and raspberry flavors so far.<br /><br />I've used the vanilla, hazelnut, caramel and chocolate in my morning coffee, and they add a nice flavor without overpowering the coffee.  I'm guessing I added about a tablespoon per cup of coffee.<br /><br />My kids liked the chocolate flavor mixed into hot cocoa.  We mixed some of the raspberry flavor into homemade yogurt, and that was pretty tasty too.  We haven't tried the Irish cream flavor yet, but I've used it in coffee before and I'm sure it will be the same.<br /><br />Overall, this is an expensive indulgence (for me) but one I'm glad I tried. Kind of expensive, but good flavors and they last a long time 4 3 
I was surprised how many haters there are for the Lite version. Disclaimer: I've never tried the full fat version and I'm sure it's delicious, but if you're watching your fat intake, there has to be some compromise.  I saw this at the grocery store next to the regular Baconnaise.<br />Lite version: 2.5 grams fat per 2 Tbl.<br />Original version: 9 grams fat per 2 Tbl.<br /><br />I'm used to eating lite variations (though not fat free, yuck) of sour cream, mayo, salad dressing, etc.  So this wasn't a big leap for me. First sandwich, I was not impressed. Second sandwich, meh. By the third sandwich I was hooked. When by bottle ran out I had a hard time going back to plain mayo. I've been eating it so much that I don't even want to try the fattier version b/c then I'll be eating even more, yikes!<br /><br />It may not be a good taste for everyone, and I can understand that. But it's yummy to me :-) Good for being lite 4 3 
I am becoming one of Goya's biggest fans. I had seen these on the shelves,<br />and they were really inexpensive, but I opted for a test can of Vienna<br />sausages instead. They were so good I went back the next day to get this<br />tin of sardines.<br /><br />They have a great sardine flavor, not fishy or oily at all, and the tomato<br />sauce is thick and rich. I am of the opinion that sardines make everything<br />taste better, and these go great just on a regular saltine. Great for snacks<br />or a pack lunch or road trips. I'll probably edit this review sometime in<br />the next month to give this product 5 stars cause I see addiction ahead. LOL Very tasty! 4 5 
great coffees & I enjoyed the most when friends come over for coffee, it gives lot of fun to try out all the flovor 50 Nespresso Capsules Variety 4 5 
These were tasty noodles, but easy to overcook. Followed package directions exactly, but ended up with a mass of overly soft rice noodles. Managed to make them work when I mixed them into the sauce, but would recommend undercooking them prior to use to maintain the integrity of the noodle.<br /><br />Also, they were a thinner cut than I was expecting - I was hoping to get a wider noodle.<br /><br />Was able to make a delicious dinner with a mix of asian sauce ingredients, so this was a winner in my book. Family was happy - so all is good! Enjoyed These! 4 3 
This is a great on the go breakfast or snack. It tastes so good and easy to carry around. I would recommend this to anyone! Yummy snack! 4 5 
This tea is strong and has a smoky flavor - you can feel the leafy greenness though. It's not very bitter. I think it's a bit expensive for it is - but I haven't found a replacement. I guess we're paying for the fancy packaging, which in my opinion is a real waste, especially when you go through 3-4 cups a day like I do. Ahmed's Gunpowder green tea is stronger and is pretty good, but is available for cheaper than Dilmah's in the local Indian stores. Strong Green Tea 4 3 
I was drawn in by the Spartan graphics, but,I<br />like this product much better than the more well known competitors.<br />No overpowering "sweettart" smell or taste.<br />Good balance of sweet and sour. No after taste.<br />Doesnt leave your stomach upset.<br />Only requet is for a no calorie version. Great job!<a href="http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/B004RBG322">Spartan Energy Drink</a> Spartan Energy Drink 4 5 
Very good waffle mix.  Simple and turns out the same every time.  Healthy and comparable to any more expensive mixes.  Just follow the easy instructions and enjoy the results. hdbiker 4 5 
These Kitchen of Indian meals are great for a quick and easy meal. They are not as good as going to a very good Indian restaurant, but they are close enough to give you a satisfying fix if you love Indian food and flavors as I do. Just make a few servings of rice to go along with this and you're all set.<br /><br />One of my local grocery stores actually sells these a little cheaper, but they never have carried the Navratan Korma flavor, so that's why I get them from Amazon. I also really like the Rajma Masala (with the red kidney beans) and the Palek Paneer (with the spinach and cottage cheese) flavors.<br /><br />Whether you already love Indian food or just want to try something new, spicy and flavorful, I can heartily recommend this brand. Quick, easy fix for Indian Food 4 5 
If you don't like ginger then don't pick up a ginger drink, but if you like ginger then I do suggest Gold Kili All Natural Instant Ginger & Lemon Beverage. It has a very intense ginger taste to it, much stronger ginger flavor then I was expecting and a very very mellow lemon flavor that is so mellow because the ginger just takes everything over.<br /><br />The smell of the drink when you first open the package it ginger overload, to me smelled like a gingerbread cookie with some lemon on top. Getting your drink just right is very easy, just open and pour your contents into a cup and add your choice of water and stir. Easy as 1 2 3 and your done. No need to sweeten your drink as it is already sweet with honey already inside.<br /><br />Can be served two different ways: hot & cold but I have to say I would prefer the hot way as it is very soothing to drink. Ginger is a wonderful way to settle your upset stomach and the fact that this drink mix is caffeine free is another bonus for that means I can drink it at any time and not have to worry about it keeping me up at night.<br /><br />If you like ginger check it out, for as a fan of ginger drinks/teas I have to say this has to be one of the better ones that I have tried. Strong Ginger But It Works 4 3 
I like the sparking refreshing taste of Kiwi in combination with Strawberry but I probably would not sacrifice my thirst for the traditional diet free soda drinks that I got used to. Cool refreshing Kiwi taste 4 3 
I don't usually like domestic lagers especially from large brewing companies.  This however is a wonderful example of the fuller European style, something akin to a full bodied Belgian Lager.  So easy to make. I recommend getting the full kit which has appropriate malts and sugars and the carbonation drops!  I live in New Hampshire and I brewed this in January when it was very cold.  After the initial fermentation it's been sitting in the bottle at around 50 degrees for a couple of months. The larger yeasts can survive at these cold temps where an ale yeast couldn't.<br /><br />This is so good I think I'm going to have to brew another batch so it will be ready for summer! Shockingly good! 4 5 
I keep a case of these in my office and always have at least a tin or two on my desk for visitors to help themselves to. Some folks stop by just to grab some mints and others pop them like candy while we meet. When I find someone who keeps coming back for more I just give them their own tin! One co-worker asked me to save the tins for her so she could use them as pillboxes and safety pin boxes. Like I said, theyre a real hit. Since I wouldn't be able to keep my hands off a candy dish, this is a good alternative to have around and it's nice to have them around if I have garlic for lunch! I gave the item 4 stars because they aren't as tasty as the sugar version of the mints  but what sugar free item is as good as it's full sugar counterpart?) and because of the fact that each tin is wrapped in plastic which seems like a waste and is irritating to remove (although I totally get why they wrap it - it still doesn't make it easy to deal with). A huge hit at the office! 4 5 
I have been struggling to find them in the shops nearby.<br />Much more convenient to order them through Amazon (slightly more expensive, but I save the gas and the burden). Finally 4 5 
I recieved this item the other day and while the packaging looks really nice, It was much smaller than expected, although the "brews 60 cups" is right, only if you use the super tiny 6oz cups that are on your coffee maker or like your coffee pretty weak.<br /><br />I would say that these bags are pretty small and you "might" get 3 coffee maker uses per bag if you're lucky, probably more like 2 uses per bag as they are much smaller than expected.  The quality of the product is VERY good however and I'm sure my brother in law will love this gift since he usually drinks awful folgers!<br /><br />Shipped fast and I would order from them again for gift purposes! Nice but small 4 3 
This is a great, yummy snack! It's healthy and easy to grab on the go AND still tastes great. I would recommend it to anyone, especially if you love Banana Nut Bread... it tastes just like the real thing. Yum! 4 5 
The dogs eat it up. The nuggets are small and heavy. A bit expensive. Made in canada. Good for dog allergic to wheat 4 3 
Use this powdered peanut butter in smoothies.  Easy way to use for this purpose.  No messy clean up.  Saw the Hungry Girl use it and decided to give it a try. Easy to Use 4 5 
I have used these on fondant and on royal icing.  They have worked for me every time.  I have read a lot of reviews about the ink running out, but they haven't on me.  I have used the same package of pens and they have decorated over 100 cookies so far and they are still going!  I'll post a couple pictures of cookies I have actually detailed with this product.<br /><br />Only caution is that they can be wet, so you have to be quick and precise with your writing.  And use light pressure.  If you need to repeatedly go back over your lines, you'll have issues. Great for outlines and fine details! 4 5 
As a confirmed chocoholic, I am always on the lookout for something chocolate that might legitimately be eaten as a breakfast food.  When I found Nature's Path Love Crunch Premium Organic Granola, Dark Chocolate and Red Berries, I thought I had reached the end of my quest.<br /><br />The granola portion of this cereal is excellent - it is flavorful and tastes good.  However, the red berries - which appear to be dried strawberries - were lacking in flavor and added little more than some color to the cereal.  I found the tiny chocolate squares to be grainy.<br /><br />This product would be excellent used as a basis for a cheesecake crust or as a layer in a dessert parfait.  It might work well as an addition in basic chocolate chip cookie dough as a substitute for oatmeal and chocolate chips.  It is a granola that allows you to use your imagination andd to enjoy it in multiple forms. More Than Just A Breakfast Cereal... 4 3 
Cotechino is a staple on italian dinner tables, especially on or around New Year's Day when it's traditionally served with lentils. Parmacotto is a popular brand in Italy and the cotechino did not disappoint, but the price ($25.00 plus $7.99) was ridiculously high -- the typical cotechino sold in Italy is usually at least twice as big as this one.<br /><br />As cotechino seems to be very hard to find in the US outside of a few metro areas with big italian communities (NY or SF), this may be your only option to try it but be aware that you'll be paying a lot of dough for a pretty small sausage. Good but overpriced 4 3 
Tried these on our two Schnauzers----they were impressed!  These are rather large biscuits that are made to break in half which makes them a perfect size for a snack or reward.  They have a good crunch which I think is good for dental health.  Anyway, I have a box of Alpo Variety Snacks and a box of Milk Bone Flavor Snacks to which I compared ingredients.  They both have artificial color, Alpo lists animal digest, whatever that is, while Milk Bone won the contest with all of those ingredients that no one can pronounce.  I would list what makes up all three but think it would not be too interesting and you probably have at least one of the listed brands if you give your pet treats.<br />What sets the Newman's Own apart is the simple list of Organic ingredients including lamb, carrots, apples, molasses, barley and tocopherols for Vitamin E.  It is made in New Zealand where they raise a lot of lamb, so this seems just the perfect place. The bottom line is our dogs think Pa and Nell Newman have a great product and would highly recommend it to their four legged friends.  Life could not be better than living with happy dogs.  So, on their input I must give this product a five star rating. Schnauzer Recommended! 5 4 
+Really really tasty<br />+Much healthier than almost every other potato chip<br />+A variety of flavors, consider this a huge sampler<br /><br />-Sea Salt & Vinegar is crazy sour. Personally, I think they overdid it on the vinegar.<br />-It's hard to stop at one serving, but I take this as a sign of a good snack :P New favorite munchies, found! 5 4 
My four mixed breed dogs (40lbs-100lbs)gobble up Newman's Own dog treats.  But, these terrific dogs gobble up just about anything (except fresh green leafy vegetables), so perhaps their standards shouldn't be the mark of "goodness".<br /><br />I'm an ingredient list reader for all foods (human & animal), so that is what I did when I received the Newman's pet treats.  The ingredient list is short & consists of the following:<br /><br />Organic Barley, Organic Lamb, Organic Carrots, Organic Apples, Organic Palm Oil (Preserved with Mixed Tocopherois, a Source of Vitamin E), Organic Molasses<br /><br />The treats themselves are rectangular & scored in the middle.  They are 2" x 1-/4" for the full size & 1" x 1-1/4" for the 1/2 size.  They do not have a strong smell, but a hint of apple is noticeable (& a grain smell, which I presume is the barley).  My 10oz bag came with 18 full size treats.<br /><br />I like the rectangular shape of the treat.  Sometimes my large dogs get excited about treats & forget about "nicely".  With the rectangular shape, my hands won't fall victim to an enthusiastic chomp.  Since the treats are scored down the middle, I can break them down, so my older, smaller dogs can easily eat the treat.<br /><br />Overall, I think the ingredients are excellent for a dog treat, and it is nice that they are adaptable for different sized dogs. Tail Wagging Treats! 5 3 
First package was lost in the mail, but JR shipped a backup at no charge with 24 hour shipment!!!! Customer service by J R Mushrooms 5 1 
We love these chips. They can be eaten alone, since they are so crisp and tasty or with a dip. Every one that we have introduced the chips to, loves them. And the expiration date is for 8 months from now, so ordering 12 bags didn't come near to them going stale. Great 5 4 
I love coffee with no bitterness and lots of good coffee taste and this one fits the bill. Holds up well to milk & sugar-I love it in the morning for the first cup and in the evening just as much. Definitely would buy it again. Good medium strength coffee 5 4 
While you would expect Ghiradelli to make good chocolate, the flavor of this mocha cocoa is precisely that of great darker chocolate flavor, using just enough coffee flavor to accent the cocoa without overtaking it.  A smooth, delicious start or finish to your day - even a warm afternoon pick me up on those chilly days! The Chocolate side of Mocha 5 4 
When I first saw the website for this i thought it was a joke, especially growing up listening to the Offspring, Pennywise, the Vandals et al... anyways, decided to see who carried it and they have it at my podunk, hillbilly a$$ food 4 less here... $3 bucks a bottle, kinda pricey, I thought, till i saw how much it is here on amazon... I suggest checking your local Albertson's or Food 4 less and seeing if they have it, you'll never want tapatillo or chalula again... this is the real deal and tastes amazing!! I guess if it's one thing us Southern Californian's have in common it's our love of mexican food, and as any good So Cal resident knows, the salsa makes the burrito (or at least can make it go down easier in some cases)... Seriously good hot sauce!!! The BEST mexican style hot sauce you'll find!!! 5 1 
My dogs enjoy any type of "puppy cookie", they're not picky at all. But I noticed that in feeding them this product they started to prefer this brand over all others! I am happy knowing they enjoy it, but I'm even happier knowing that it is filled with all sorts of good "real" food - not by-products and what not. I would highly recommend these! My Dogs Loved them!! 5 4 
I have been eating the 100 Calorie Chip Ahoy for sometime. I really find that it is a filling, guilt-free snack. It has a unique taste of its own - not a `diet' food-type taste either, it taste like a `real' snack. Very Good 5 4 
Now I know this formulation is not the most natural or high grade one on the market right now. Believe me, I have tried to get her interested in just about every brand with the word "natural" in the title, and she is not having it. She won't get the benefit of the food if she won't eat it. So when I noticed she was eating all of her food when I put this in front of her, I decided to stick with what is apparently working. This is still premium food, formulated for my twelve year-old's needs, and she really, really likes it. 'Nuff said. Cat LOVES this stuff. 5 3 
Mrs. May's pumpkin crunch is a great snack. For those of you watching calories and intake, be aware that the 2oz portions are two servings. Most of Mrs. May's products are great, but with the fat at 11g per serving, i find it's not a complete guilt free snack. However, the pumpkin seed crunch has 9gms of protein per serving vs. the usual 4gms in their other snacks. So if you're monitoring your intake and want to indulge in these now and then, the pumpkin seed crunch is the healthiest option of the bunch.<br /><br />That said, they are all tasty and certainly not bad for you, just a little high in fat if you're watching your weight. Highest in protein 5 4 
For those of us on the West Coast Carl's Jr serves King Syrup in their syrup packets for French Toast. King's syrup 5 4 
One of my boys needed to lose some weight and the other didn't.  I put this food on the floor for the chubby guy, and the protein-rich, no by-product food up higher where only my skinny boy can jump.  The higher food sits going stale.  They both really go for this food.  And my chubby boy has been losing about an ounce a week. My cats LOVE this "diet" food better than their regular food 5 4 
I can't say enough about these nuts, they are fantastic!  I stopped buying them years ago because they were way too expensive but at Amazon's price I'm now a subscription customer.  The only problem with these nuts is that once you open the can you don't want to stop eating them.  They have a Kona Coffee glaze and have just a hint of coffee flavor. I highly recommend this product. Nuts Over These Nuts 5 4 
I got these in the mail today, i know right, sounds so weird to say i got hash browns in the mail, haha.  Come in dry ice cooler and were in box all in their own lil plastic bags.  Just stick them on a baking sheet for 35 min. at 400 degrees.  when you get them out of the oven you smell the cheese and it has nice crunchy outside with creamy potato inside, if you want the best side dish to your steak or other meat, hey could even use for breakfast with some eggs and sausage, your choice, this get a 5/5 for taste, 5/5 for presentation, buy these now, great price too, thanks for your time, and thank you omaha steaks, the best at great prices. These are the best hash browns!!!!!!!!!! 5 4 
I have been GF for the past year and have tried all sorts of flour alternatives. This one is certainly the best, and the best part about it, is you can substitute it for any creation that calls for original bisquick. The best so far is the waffles that you can make following the directions on the back. I will be ordering again!! My only complaint is that the boxes are small compared to the other boxes of bisquick available on the shelves. Finally, a tasty GF baking mix 5 4 
I love coffee, but I also love not having to messing with the coffee maker sometimes.  This instant espresso is the best I have tried and I have tried about 7 different brands.<br /><br />Not overly acidic at all, melts instantly in hot water (no sand dunes left swirling at the top if your cup), travels wonderfully (compact jar) and is very versitile to have around for cooking:<br /><br /> -- I but a tsp. in a batch of brownies to deepen the dark chocolate flavor<br /><br /> -- I put a Tbs in a BIG batch of chili to compliment the spices and add extra richness.<br /><br /> -- I add a bit to mexican mole sauce for punch.<br /><br /> -- I also put it in: chocolate granache icing, chai tea with milk for a java chai latte, coffee drink mixes for extra umph, etc.<br /><br />It is over 5 bucks at some supermarkets, when/if you can even find it, so it is nice to know it is cheaper at amazon! SOOOoo Good and VERY versitile 5 4 
This product is delicious.  I will say this upfront - Thou semi messy (why not place the peanut butter in the center??? Instead on the back?)  The taste is great.  So great that I started to eat them all day -- not good as it ruins the enjoyment!!!<br /><br />These are actually so good I had to stop eating them!!! (I guess I over did it!!!)<br /><br />Value:  Excellent snack for everyone (all my friends love them) / family.<br /><br />Shipping:  Fast (as always with Amazon Prime membership - 2 days)<br /><br />Packaging:  6 Boxes Total - each contains 6 individually wrapped granola "thins"  (1/3 of granola bar but flat with peanut butter on one side [seriously).<br /><br />Also do not ruin the granola as I did by eating every day!!! Also I notice to avoid mess just open with scissors!!! (pealing makes a mess!!!)<br /><br />[...]  Exclusively Delicious &  HEALTHY SNACK 5 4 
Sleepytime tea is one of those teas that can always be counted on. It's very mellow, with a great taste and smell. Perfect for relaxing after a long day. This is the tea that all other herbal teas should be measured against. Flawless herbal tea 5 3 
I saw an ad for Runa guayusa in Mother Jones magazine and because it is a Fair Trade item and described as less bitter than tea, I thought I'd give it a try.<br /><br />It is exactly as advertised - no bitterness, just a little hint of sweetness, and a nice gentle flavor.  Very easy drinking, and it does give a kick of caffeine energy.  I have been a Diet Pepsi / Diet Coke drinker for 25 years because I like their tastes and the caffeine (never could do coffee and tea is too bitter), but I have recently converted to being a bicycle commuter for work and needed to ditch the heavy soda drinks.  This guayusa is perfect - as tea bags, it is obviously lighter than hauling around sodas, and it has more caffeine too.  Better for me, too.  And no bitterness like tea or coffee.  And I'm supporting fair trade small farmers in Ecuador instead of giant soda companies.  The packaging is 100% recycled, 70% post-consumer.<br /><br />This guayusa is as good as advertised, I like drinking it, and I can't think of any negatives.  5 stars.  I'm glad I found this product, it is worth the price. As good as advertised 5 4 
Bought as a Christmas present. Smells like a milk shake. I might have to try it, might make a coffee drinker out of me! Great aroma, and I don't like coffee 5 4 
I have used this product multiple times.  In fact, I purchased four tubs of the gold and silver luster dust (2 each) five years ago and I am JUST NOW running out!  I use this stuff to gild all sorts of things for Renaissance themed banquets - including gilding an entire roast duck and then, using vodka, painting filigree designs onto it!  The clients thought it was prop food it looked so beautiful.  I can't recommend this stuff enough! The Inexpensive Alternative to Gold Leaf! 5 3 
Great value and much superior to what you find in stores. Makes a great snack or after dinner treat, but for those who are health conscious remember to keep it to a few pieces since they are covered in thin sugar. Try to keep the bag tightly sealed once you open them since the slowly begin to dry up. Will be ordering more soon :) Mango anytime! 5 4 
I love all of Newman's Own products, and I like that their dog treats are all-natural and that it's a trustworthy brand. My dogs really like these treats and they are a good-sized for a snack for medium/small dogs (I have pugs). The biscuits are hard and they come in "sets" of two, but are easy to break apart. The broken-apart squares are about one square inch.<br /><br />They are definitely hard snacks, and they are easy to break into one square, but I could see that it would be difficult to break them up further. They are perfect for my dogs, but I would say that they may be difficult for tiny dogs to chew because of their size and crunchiness. Great, All-Natural Treats - Good Snack Size 5 4 
This is an excellent tea, very flavorful - the cinnamon is fresh and powerful, and overall it's slightly sweet without needing any sugar. Excellent with milk or straight. Excellent tea 5 4 
My baby loves this apple sauce. He didn't like the gerber brand at all, but yummys this down right away and I like that it is organic. yummy 5 4 
I ordered the Grade B Hidden Springs Syrup -- Grade B is my favorite for baking.  I love the strong, rich maple flavor.  This is my favorite amongst several maple syrups that I've ordered from Amazon.  Maple syrup is understandably expensive, but this syrup is a good value among its' competitors. Rich maple flavor, good value 5 4 
We have a pug that suffers from chronic ear infections and skin problems.  We've consistently kept him on expensive brands that are well known for having good ingredients like California Natural, Chicken Soup for the dog lover's soul, Royal Canin, and a couple others that I can't remember off the top of my head.<br /><br />My Mom picked up this Newman's food because it was available at the grocery store.  They love the food, but what really surprises me is that his ears and skin have improved dramatically.  His stools are also much firmer and way less stinky than before.  This food seems like a real winner for us. This food is working shockingly well for our allergy prone pug. 5 4 
The coffee cartels and monopolies are desperately trying to control market prices, enter Coffee Bean Direct, offering a great product for a very reasonable price, and oh soo fresh too! That $8.99 a pound stuff at the grocery is just not on the same page! I am gonna shut up now; you need to go order up a bag and see for for yourself! you gotta try this--best for the buck!! 5 1 
We love the Earth's Best line in our house. Our 9 mo old daughter  will ONLY eat Earth's Best dinners, and I don't blame her. The smell from both of the other 2 brand was nauseating. I've sampled the Earth's best dinners myself, and they aren't half bad... It is baby food.... The fruit blends and veggie blends are great as well. Earth's Best is the BEST 5 2 
I am potato chip-addicted. I don't only enjoy potato chips, but I also enjoy any type of potato product. This product really hit the mark for me.<br /><br />I consider these a full-fledged snack. Each bag is packed with chips. They are moderately seasoned, and full of flavor. The consistency is slightly like a popcorn cake -- but they're crisp and crunchy, not puffy. They have a distinct potato taste.<br /><br />The best part? Each bag clocks in at only 100 calories! And I repeat -- these are not a simple "100 calorie" snack. What you get here is a full bag of chips. What's great about the content vs. calorie content is that these are perfect to accompany your lunch without feeling guilty about eating a 200-300 calorie bag of chips.<br /><br />My personal favorites were the Sea Salt and Vinegar and the Original. The barbecue flavor is sweet, not smoky. The Salt and Pepper, Cheddar, and Sour Cream and Onion flavors are standard fair. But the chips are adequately and evenly seasoned and I did not notice differences in seasoning from one chip to the next.<br /><br />These are a great product, well manufactured, and a treat to eat. I'll definitely buy more of these in the future. Tasty potato chips, low in calories, great flavor 5 4 
My son is sensitive to cows milk protein and I am trying to keep him off of soy.  My milk was not enough for him, and I did not like the ingredients in baby formula (all had soy and most have cows milk protein, not to mention 45% corn syrup solids).  My pediatrician recommended this powdered goats milk because they add folate (not normally found in goats milk).  Since I have been feeding my son this milk, he has been SO happy and growing so much better! Have not had to add any vitamins/supplements to it to make it a whole food, it is fine on its own. Although, I have been using organic brown rice cereal because he is getting close to being ready for solids.  LOVE this milk! (always consult your doctor before changing your babies diet) Great Alternate for Baby Formula!! 5 4 
This product is the same as I get in Petsmart at a much better price. The service was quick and efficient. We use it for our old wiener dog who has some iron deficiencies and it helped him alot, but I am not a vet. Good Service,  Excellent Price 5 4 
This canned chicken is the perfect thing to make a quick salad, sandwhich, or toss into a soup for lunch or dinner.<br /><br />While it will never replace a roast chicken in the oven ready to be served, it's got a nice chicken taste. It's just not as firm as regular chicken you prepared yourself.<br /><br />If you remember to keep a can or two in your desk at work, you won't be without some solid nutrition in a pinch. Try it cold with some yummy salad dressing and a few crackers!<br /><br />Swanson Premium Chunk Chicken Breast is an excellent buy. If you have this in the pantry, you've got a quick meal. 5 4 
Sometimes, I'd rather have cocoa instead of coffee at work. This meets my cocoa craving. I do not need to add sugar - just add water and brew! This hits the spot! 5 4 
I have to say the new offerings are great. the french roast and the Italian roast have a nice strong coffee flavor. I would say remember your first cup out of a keurig, the reason you bought a machine, these two flavors remind me of that.<br />Those first few lines are from my review for the Italian roast, they are both excellent. i really like it 5 4 
I really  like this dental treat and my dogs love them.  They are wheat free which is great for my German short=hair pointer who is wheat intolerant.  Only problem is it is hard to find this product in my local pet stores and on line.  I even contacted the manufacturer, who was not very helpful in locating it and just referred me back to my local pet store who hasn't had this in stock for EVER.  I have since given up on finding it. Bright Bites doggie dental treats 5 4 
Let me preface this review by saying that in the gluten-free world, baked goods tend to be a bit on the crumbly side because they are missing the "glue" (gluten) that holds them together.  Taking this into consideration, Nana's gluten free cookie bars are one of the tastiest gluten-free treats and one of the only brands sweetened with fruit juice instead of sugar.<br /><br />At only 130 calories, 4.5 grams of fat, and 7 grams of sugar (natural fruit sugar), the Nana Banana flavor of cookie bars makes a great treat for kids and adults.  The amount of banana is just right, and you even get a few tiny bits of crunchy banana inside.<br /><br />Each cookie measures approximately 3.5 inches long by 1.5 inches wide...perfect for a light snack or dessert, especially for kids.  Amazon has the best price around on Nana's Cookie Bars, so rest assured that you are getting a good deal, even though they are pricier than "regular" cookies made with corn syrup and sugar.<br /><br />Good cookies aren't cheap, and cheap cookies aren't good!  Give Nana's banana cookies a try.  (No, I don't work for Nana's but am a happy, loyal customer!) Nana Banana - a delicious gluten-free treat for kids or adults! 5 4 
The thing I like most about this brand of hot chocolate is that once I remove it from the keurig, it doesn't leak all over the place.  For some reason, all the hot chocolates I've purchased before leak all over when you remove them from the coffee pot.  My coffee doesn't do that so not sure why that is.  This is a great deal for the amount you get as well, and taste yummy! Yummy! 5 4 
My dog loves these snacks and they don't have artificial ingredients.<br /><br />They come in a resealable bag which is good - they do get a bit hard if they are not kept sealed up. Great snacks 5 4 
What's to say about Oreos?  The originals are still the best & I don't get them often because gluttony overcomes me.  One, two, or even a few isn't possible for me. Yay! 5 4 
This product is indeed fabulous and you can get it at many grocery stores for a lesser price.  Overall a great product and makes awesome red sauce!  TO SQUISM:  I find it very disturbing that you casually refer to hitting your wife, even if you are joking, this is not the place for that sort of behavior!!!!  If you really hit your wife your a punk coward.  Domestic abuse IS NOT a laughing matter and I was personally offended by your review.  Try to maintain some amount of class when posting on here.  I am sure that is something you are incapable of doing, judging by your disgusting and classless review. Squism needs help! 5 3 
This is what I was looking for and was missing it. The taste is exactly the taste as the one made in India so just loved it and remember my days back in India. Definitely recommend it. great taste 5 4 
I have two cats, one who eats wet food as a last resort (mostly she licks up the gravy), and one who has food allergies (grains) and is incredibly picky (won't eat any grain free cat treats i've found so far--greenies, the tasty junk food ones, wellness cat jerky bits, shaved salmon, etc-- doesn't like catnip, and turns his nose up at anything that costs less than $1.29 a can it seems, to include spots stew; authority; organix; most flavors of avo-derm, holistic select, and innova; max cat; and natural choice).<br /><br />she still licks up the gravy, and eats about half her bowl. He eats his portion and finishes hers, with no vomiting or retching (so nice!). He also wakes me up in the morning if it's breakfast time and i haven't gotten the memo yet, and looks at me like i just kicked his grandma cat when i've run out.<br /><br />this has quite a bit of juice in it, which is good since most cats don't drink enough water anyway.<br /><br />as for me, i love this food b/c it doesn't smell to high heaven, and i haven't died from litterbox duty as of yet. ;) (get it? duty--dooty? hehe) thank goodness for grainfree 5 3 
This was my first time ordering something from the Vine that I could not really review myself.  And our dog, Lucky, can't speak...English.  I do, however, understand a little Dog speak.  When first presented with one of Newman's Own Lamb and Barley NZ Style Dog Treats, he snarfed it down just as expected, just as he does with all treats.  But the next day, as he  saw me go for the bag a second time - he went ballistic.  When I gave him the treat, he retreated into the den with it as if it were a bone.  Same thing happened the third time. Conclusion:  Lucky says "Big Yum! to Newman's Treats.<br /><br />JMT Lucky says yumm! 5 3 
Walker's Highlanders are my favorite purchased cookie, so it was great to find them pre-packaged into 2 biscuits. Keeps them fresh longer and limits my snacking! Nicely packaged for a serving 5 4 
I recently went gluten free and this is one of my favorite mixes.  I used it for biscuits and pancakes and it's very good.  You can also use it for pizza dough and to make fried chicken - it's about average for that. Keep this stock on my shelf 5 4 
I rescued my dog a year ago. Ever since then, I've been feeding him Newman's. I like that the main ingredient is a form of meat and there isn't a lot of grain type of ingredients. All of the ingredients are organic, so it's really good for my dog. I've tried several other brands with my dog. But I don't think he's really allergic to anything or has a distaste for anything in particular. And since this is one of the cheaper brands out there that is still nutritious, I decided to stick to this brand. Ordering it on Amazon is very convenient because I can use the Subscribe & Save feature and set the schedule of when I want the dog food delivered. I never have to worry about running out of dog food! Great dog food! 5 2 
Tasted good. Spicy. Those that don't like spicy should stay away from this. For the price paid, very good buy. Yummy! 5 4 
Low Sodium, Low in Cholesterol. Less empty calories than candy & can make a quick decent breakfast. I would buy them again. Great substitute for candy bars 5 4 
